
“Hmm. I had intended to wait until we arrived at the castle, but…” He grabbed a handful of something in his item pouch and pulled it out easily. He tossed it into the cage, where Priestess caught it.

In her hand were several small rings, each set with a blue gem.

“Those rings have the Breathe spell sealed inside,” Goblin Slayer said calmly. This was a spell that would allow one to breathe freely.

About the only spell caster Priestess could think of who might be capable of doing such tricks as this was Witch. Even if the thought of the buxom magician made Priestess keenly aware of her own all-too-thin body.

She put that aside and said, “Goblin Slayer, sir, if you’re giving us rings to breathe underwater, does that mean…?”

In the back of her mind, Priestess pictured those ruins they had visited, the ones ruled over by an ogre. Goblin Slayer had used a scroll inscribed with the Gate spell to launch a high-pressure jet of water transported from the bottom of the sea toward the monster.

“Of course you have that,” Priestess said.

“The rings won’t work for long,” Goblin Slayer said sharply. “But they will help take the edge off the cold, even out here in the snow.”

“Awesome! Why didn’t you say so sooner, Orcbolg?!”

High Elf Archer clapped her hands, flicked her ears, and with a great show of joy put the ring on her finger.

“Mmmm!” she said. To all appearances, it was true that the ring helped with the cold. Perhaps it made sense, of a sort: snow was just frozen water, after all.

“The ring alone doesn’t do that much, but combined with the dwarf’s stone, I’m pretty warm,” the elf said.

“Oh, uh… Let me try, then…” With a good deal of reluctance, Priestess put on her ring. The moment she did so, the chill was blunted all around her body, as if she had buried herself in a blanket.

“Oh!” she exclaimed involuntarily. “This is amazing!”

“Isn’t it?” High Elf Archer said, closing her eyes and looking as proud as if she had come up with the rings herself.

Dwarf Shaman, listening to this, snorted out a laugh.

“Hey, what?” grumbled High Elf Archer, pouting.

“Goodness…” Priestess sighed and looked at Noble Fencer just beside her. She was met with a forceful gaze and icy eyes. “Here, why don’t you try a ring, too?”

“………I don’t need it,” Noble Fencer replied, shaking her head so hard her golden hair quivered violently. “………I’m not cold.”

“Come on, how can you say that…?”

Suddenly, Priestess remembered the younger girls at the Temple. It was the sort of thing that they would have said pointedly (whatsoever their reasons) when they went out in winter in only the thinnest vestments, even as their noses dripped with snot.

Gently, Priestess took Noble Fencer’s hand. As expected, it was freezing cold.

“Here, I’ll help you put it on.”

“……I told you, I’m not—achoo!” She sneezed, then quickly looked away from the surprised Priestess. “……I’m not cold.”

“…Sure, sure.” Priestess struggled to suppress a laugh. “I’ll make sure everyone knows. But I’m still going to put this ring on you.”

“…………Hrm.”

And so, no longer taking no for an answer, Priestess slid the ring onto the fighter’s finger.

The blue stones glittered on the girls’ hands.

“Heh! Guess I can’t run away anymore now that I’m wearing this.” Even High Elf Archer seemed to be getting in on the fun, giggling as she spoke.

“……”

Noble Fencer remained silent and sullen, paying the others no mind, but the three of them stuck close to the warm stones. The warming effect granted by their rings with the pretty blue stones might not last very long—but the rings themselves would be left over.

“Heyo, girls, that’s enough chitchat. Back to looking frightened.” Dwarf Shaman tried to look as menacing as he could in hopes of encouraging them in their act.

“Come on, dwarf, you don’t have to spoil the moment!”

“Moment? Speak for yourself, Long-Ears. What kind of slaves show up laughing and gossiping?”

When he put it that way, she couldn’t very well argue. High Elf Archer pursed her lips in annoyance but went quiet.

“Take the lead,” Goblin Slayer said. “My night vision is too poor.”

In fact, it would be quite unusual for an agent of chaos to carry a torch. Goblin Slayer took the pole of the cage on his shoulder, now following Lizard Priest.

“Leave it to me. Best you follow closely, my wandering knight.” With a hissing, throaty chuckle, Lizard Priest moved forward in somber strides.

The great black gate of the fortress was nearly before them, impossible to miss against the snow-whitened mountain.

§

“We request entrance!”

Lizard Priest’s booming voice could be heard even over the howling of the blizzard. A dragon’s roar, indeed. There was no way the fortress’s inhabitants could have missed him.

“Your visitor is a servant of the god of external knowledge, a priest of the eye of the green moon! Brothers, will you not open this gate to me?!”

Lizard Priest was (in fact) a cleric, and one who had applied himself long and diligently enough to rise to Silver rank. He had the bearing to pose as a high-placed member of any religion.

As the last echo of his voice vanished into the storm, Dwarf Shaman nudged Goblin Slayer with his elbow.

“Hard to believe he’s just acting, eh? I don’t think the little girl would quite have been up to it.”

“True.”

“Given how scantily clad shrine maidens of the evil gods tend to be, it might’ve been interesting, though.”

“Is that so?”

“What’s this? I thought you liked her display at the festival. Don’t you want to dress her up?”

“I’m not interested.”

The two spoke quickly and quietly, facing forward so they would still seem to be faithful disciples of Lizard Priest.

After a moment, Dwarf Shaman said, “I wonder if this goblin paladin or whatever is strong. What do you think, Beard-cutter?”

“I don’t know,” he murmured. “But we should operate on the assumption that he’s stronger than us.”

“You mean so that whatever the reality is, we’ll be prepared?”

“Yes.”

“I suppose if we assumed he was a fool and he got the drop on us, that would only prove we were foolish.”

Goblins were stupid, but they weren’t fools. Such had always been one of Goblin Slayer’s most important tenets. He nodded wordlessly at Dwarf Shaman.

“Hmmm.” There was no response to Lizard Priest’s summons. The gate remained shut fast, the only answer the crying of the wind.

Very well, then. Lizard Priest gathered up the sleeve of his ostentatiously colored robe and withdrew something from it: a wood-carved eye, the work of Dwarf Shaman, made in imitation of the brand they had found. This he held up.

“The blue eye of the god of external knowledge looks upon you! Brothers, those who share in knowing, open now this gate!”

At last, something happened.

The very slightest of gaps appeared beneath the gate. This was followed by a clatter of pulleys, and gears turned by chains, and with a mighty groan the door began to open.

Goblin Slayer watched the gate with absolute concentration. How many goblins would he find operating it? Whatever the number, their enemy had a huge fighting force. Now things were getting interesting.

“Um… This is going to be okay…isn’t it?”

At the soft but unexpected voice from behind him, Goblin Slayer moved only his eyes behind his helmet. From the other side of the bars, Priestess was looking at him with a trace of nervousness.

“Do you think they’ll…throw us straight in the dungeon or…or anything?”

“Most likely.” Goblin Slayer nodded, but only the tiniest bit—the goblins could see him. “It’s better than being made a sacrifice.”

“Is… Is it?”

“Yes.”

“But…you’ll rescue us, right?”

“That’s my intention.”

Priestess opened her mouth to say something further, then quickly closed it again. Her expression softened as if she had given up.

“Well… All right, then.”

With that, she exhaled gently. Even with the various magical heaters, it fogged the moment it left her mouth.

He could have said It’ll be all right, or You can trust me, or I won’t let the goblins lay a finger on you—anything to give the girls some comfort. But he hadn’t. He never did.

Of course, if he were suddenly all warm and cuddly, she might suspect that someone had stolen his armor. But still…

He is truly hopeless, she thought. She didn’t know why it made her feel like smiling, but she suppressed the impulse. She could feel Noble Fencer beside her, her body stiff; if from nervousness or fear, Priestess didn’t know.

“It’s okay,” Priestess said. “Goblin Slayer is here. Everyone’s here.”

“They’re coming,” High Elf Archer said sharply, picking up her ears.

“GROOOBR!”

The creature that appeared was small beside the gate it emerged from, and its yell was slight compared with that of Lizard Priest.

It was a single goblin, dressed in tattered priest’s robes. He was no doubt trying to look as intimidating as possible, but his little, unsteady steps looked rather comical. Yet, somehow the silly quality, as if he was a caricature of a proud high priest, made him uncanny as well.

“GORARO! GORBB!!”

The goblin stopped in front of Lizard Priest and gestured imperiously, waving his hand and screeching something. Lizard Priest, still holding up the holy sign, nodded gravely along. Goblin Slayer and Dwarf Shaman kept their heads bowed like good disciples, silent and without talking.

“What’s he saying?” High Elf Archer whispered to Priestess.

“No idea,” she murmured back, shaking her head. How was she to understand the goblin language? “Do you think that’s the goblin paladin?”

“He sort of looks more like a high priest to me.”

“……You’re wrong.” Noble Fencer’s voice interrupted their whispering. “………That’s…not him.”

The fire of anger burned in her eyes; Priestess couldn’t miss it.

Oh…

A little thought made it all too clear where the goblin had gotten his priestly vestments.

“It’s okay…,” she said, hugging Noble Fencer. She wasn’t sure her feelings came across, but she hoped so.

Now, then.

“In that case, might we request an audience with the ruler of this fortress? The paladin himself?”

“GORA! GORARARU!”

“Oh, these? These are my two faithful servants. And these others, my…gift.” Lizard Priest made a sweeping gesture that encompassed the cage; he looked truly lordly. “We managed to capture a few pathetic adventurer girls. One of whom, I might add, already bore the mark of an offering.”

“ORRRG! GAROOM!”

“Ah, very much so, I understand. Lead us to the prison. We must cut off their limbs so they don’t escape.”

The goblin priest nodded and, with a gesture that was a comical imitation of Lizard Priest’s own, motioned the party inside.

Naturally, Lizard Priest didn’t understand goblin speech any more than the rest of them did. But their language often sounded like a child throwing a tantrum, and the meaning was generally about the same:

I want that. Gimme. He did it. It’s his fault.

What to do, then? The lithe tongue hissed a prayer:

“O Mapusaurus, ruler of the earth. Permit me to join your pack, howsoever briefly.”

This was the Communicate miracle, a work of telepathy. By borrowing some of the power of his forebears, who had hunted in packs, Lizard Priest was able to understand and make himself understood.

“Nothing can go forward if the two sides don’t understand each other. Normally this spell is used for evangelism, but…”

Such was what he had told them around the table at the inn the night before, sitting beside Dwarf Shaman, who worked tirelessly on his sewing.

“I suspect it will be necessary for us at some point to learn a few words of the goblin tongue.”

That had been Goblin Slayer’s very serious response. And now…

“Phew! Looks like it worked, somehow,” Dwarf Shaman said.

“We are still only through the gate. Don’t let down your guard.”

“Y’don’t have to tell me twice.”

The dwarf let out a short breath. Goblin Slayer shot him a look, then took in their surroundings.

Goblins.

They were in the courtyard of an old castle. Once upon a time, a spring had delivered water to the area, and banquets had perhaps been held in this marble plaza. But now, the spring was dried up; the place was covered in snow, all signs of grass and trees vanished from the garden, any sight of knights or nobles long since past. Now it was the province of goblins, and as such, it had become a waste heap caked with blood and filth.

“This is a dwarven fortress from the Age of the Gods? Look what’s become of it…”

For someone who loved adventure and the unknown as much as High Elf Archer did, this pained whisper was understandable.

“They have no idea how valuable this is…”

“Look at them all, though,” Priestess said, biting her lip in an attempt to suppress the tremble in her voice. “We have to do something about this…”

It was a stroke of good luck that the goblins saw them only as pitiful offerings. The little monsters knew how easily such prisoners could be reduced to weeping and sniveling, no matter how proud they looked or sounded.

The goblin horde numbered well beyond the dozens.

Goblin goons were everywhere: the garden, upon the walls, in the watchtower and the crenels. Each of them wore poor equipment—although it probably seemed of the highest make to goblin eyes—and each of them was watching the newcomers closely.

Their gazes carried flashes of curiosity and lust, but mostly they were filled with a terrifying hunger. The eyes of an animal, of a brainless beast, would have been better. At least wild creatures didn’t stare with such malice and greed.

“……”

Priestess forgot herself in her efforts to shield Noble Fencer from their eyes; she hugged the other girl harder. She knew from experience that it would only egg the goblins on, but she did it anyway.

“……”

In the meantime, Goblin Slayer was carefully observing the environment from under his helmet. The geography, the architecture: if he didn’t take it all in, then he was almost certain to die in whatever he might attempt.

Death hardly concerned him; but what he couldn’t stand was the thought that these goblins would remain to work their evil.

“GORARA.”

“Mm. Come, now. He says to follow him,” the lizard said, going after the goblin.

“Sure thing, master priest. C’mon, tin man.”

At Dwarf Shaman’s encouragement, Goblin Slayer hefted the pole of the cage.

They left the courtyard full of goblins, heading down a staircase that dribbled with rotting runoff from the trash. Their footsteps echoed eerily in the stone basement. It was dim and gloomy, and an indescribable stench rose up from somewhere. They doubted it was from a storehouse. Why keep food in cages?

They were in the dungeon.

The bars and locks were of dwarven make, sturdy yet beautiful. The chains within were equally breathtaking. Perhaps they had been used, at some time long past, to bind agents of chaos, or those evildoers who would have threatened this fortress.

Now, though, this place was under goblin control, and these rooms were the last residence of unfortunate young women. Imagine such a poor soul chained down here, trying to stop her nose against the unmistakable smell of rotting corpses…

“…”

Priestess heard a sound. It was Noble Fencer, who had clenched her teeth and let out a low groan. Her body was stiff in Priestess’s arms.

“ORAGARR.”

The goblin fiddled with the rusty lock, and the door of the cell came open.

The floor was slick with some unidentifiable liquid. The chains were nearly red with rust.

Being underground, the air carried a chill, though it was better than being outside. The stink of rot drifted along with the cold.

There was only a hole in which to do one’s business, and it was already full of waste. As if that weren’t enough, a human arm had been tossed carelessly into the pit as well.

High Elf Archer gave a strangled gurgle that echoed loudly. We need hardly mention elves’ superior senses…

Although human eyes couldn’t see as well as elven ones, the smell and the sense of the place all reached back to Priestess’s formative experiences. She gave a scratchy, whistling intake of breath. She was used to this sort of thing—maybe, probably, so she liked to think—but even so…

“…Eugh…”

Even so, she couldn’t help but think back to that first adventure. The young warrior striding before her, then convulsing with poison before her eyes. The wizard he had helped to kill. And the fighter, swarmed by goblins, violated in the worst possible way.

All instead of her. They had died while she had survived. While she was alive now. But wouldn’t her turn come one day?

It’s okay. It’s okay. It’s… It’s okay.

She recited the name of the Earth Mother under her breath to keep her teeth from chattering. She glanced at him.

Or at least, she tried.

“GAROU!”

“Hh—ahh!”

She felt something grab her head; she screamed. The goblin priest had reached into the cage and pulled on her hair with inhospitable violence.

“ORAGARAO!”

Open the cage and put this girl in the cell!

Whatever deity they were to be sacrificed to, it seemed it would begin with her.

Dwarf Shaman and Goblin Slayer exchanged a look and nodded, then set down the cage.

Lizard Priest said gravely, “That is well and good, then. However, if you mean to…enjoy these offerings, first I must meet the paladin, and—”

“Hrrraaaaahhhhhh!”

As the door of the cage was opened, Noble Fencer did something altogether unexpected: she forced her way out of the cage, reaching out for the goblin who was amusing himself with Priestess and wrapping her hands around his neck.

“OGA…?!”

“Hraah! Haaaaahhhh!” Howling like a wild animal, Noble Fencer took advantage of her larger body size to slam into the monster.

“GORARA…?!”

“Eep!” Priestess yelped. The half-crazed goblin priest had pulled a stone knife from his belt and grazed her with it. A thin red line of blood appeared on her cheek, and she shrank back. Even as she did so, Noble Fencer knocked the knife from the creature’s hand.

“ORAGAGAGA?!?!”

“Goblin… Goblin! Goblin!!”

She straddled him, lashing out with her fists. Each time he hollered and struck out, fresh bruises appeared on Noble Fencer’s pale skin, but she paid them no mind.

“Aaaagh! Die! Die, you piece of filth!”

A nose broke; eye sockets shattered. Teeth bent. A chin was struck.

“GARAO?!”

Even goblins were not apt to miss a disturbance of this magnitude. The other creature in the basement room, who had been waiting in anticipation of having its fun with the prisoners, raised a cry.

Then the goblin guard did a very goblin-like thing: rather than face down the attacker, he dashed up the stairs to summon his comrades.

“Feh.” Goblin Slayer clicked his tongue. His movements were rapid and precise.

Dumping the cage to the ground—and ignoring the indignant objections of High Elf Archer—he drew the sword at his hip and sent it flying.

The blade cut through the air soundlessly before burying itself in the head of the goblin on the stairs.

“ORAG?!”

The creature came rolling back down the staircase, convulsing, not comprehending what had happened to him. Goblin Slayer leaped at him immediately.

“Hmph.” He gave the sword a twist, severing the spinal cord, and when this definitive final blow had been dealt, he wrenched the sword out and kicked the body away. It tumbled the rest of the way down the stairs, landing in the pool of waste and sinking down into it. That would hide the body.

However, Goblin Slayer, never one to let down his guard, kept a close eye on the top of the staircase, their link to the surface.

“GORA?”

Just as he suspected. A patrolling goblin had picked up the ruckus on the stairs and was coming to investigate.

Goblin Slayer quickly adjusted his grip on his sword and called out to his companions, “We’ve been detected. Another one is coming.”

“Aaaaaghhh! Aaahhhhhhhh!”

Noble Fencer was still blindly beating the dead goblin priest. The creature’s hideous, uneven teeth broke the skin on her fists, but she hardly noticed. In only seconds, both her hands were covered in blood.

“St-stop! Please stop!” Priestess begged, approaching the young woman. “This isn’t the time to—ouch!” One of the flailing arms shoved her backward and she landed on her behind.

The slap of cold stone against her frail bottom was rather painful, but she pushed the sensation aside and said, “Er, ah, shall I use Silence…?”

“Nah, lassie, no sound at all would attract as much attention as too much sound,” Dwarf Shaman said. “In which case, ahem…”

He began digging through his bag, muttering as he passed over first one object and then another.

“Looks like there’s no choice,” Goblin Slayer muttered, gripping his sword tighter. When he took care of the goblin that was coming toward them now, it would inevitably make the situation worse. Should he simply take on the goblins now? No… The odds were too much against them.

As he was making these rapid calculations, Lizard Priest, who had been quiet until that moment, spoke up. “Mistress ranger, give a scream!”

“Wha? Er, who, m-me?”

High Elf Archer, who had been trying to stop Noble Fencer, was caught off guard by this sudden summons, her ears bouncing in surprise.

Lizard Priest slapped his tail against the ground in irritation. There was a note of anger in his voice as he said, “Do as I ask and scream! We haven’t any time!”

“Y-yeah, sure, okay. A scream… A scream…”

She took a deep breath through her well-formed lips, opened her mouth, and…

“N-nooooooo! Stop! Stooooooooopppp!”

Her voice was so clear and piercing it could have cut thread.

Elf voices carry very well. Her shout echoed through the basement, up the stairs, and reached the surface, if only just.

“GORARA.”

The goblin near the top of the stairs seemed to grasp what was going on. He stopped, picturing the brutalized woman. He made a vulgar gesture and glanced at Goblin Slayer where he stood on the stairs.

“GORARURU?”

Goblin Slayer shrugged, and the goblin gave an ugly laugh and a dismissive wave of his hand.

“You’ll be by later, is it?”

Goblin Slayer stared at the creature as it walked away, the disgusting smile still on its face.

They had managed to buy back a small measure of the time they had wasted. He wouldn’t squander it again.

The original plan had been to take the “sacrifices” to the master of the fortress for inspection. If there was going to be a chance to take out the goblin paladin—if such a thing existed!—that would most likely be it.

But the plan was in tatters now.

“Well, I expected as much,” Goblin Slayer muttered dispassionately as he closed the door, put in the blocks, and then went back down the stairs.

The guard’s body had floated back up to the top of the waste pool; without hesitation, he kicked it down again.

He looked over to where Noble Fencer was still pummeling the corpse of the goblin priest. “Bring that goblin over here, too. It isn’t much, but we’ll hide him.” The heavy slap of struck flesh had transformed into a watery splorch.

“Come…on… Stop already!” High Elf Archer said, tearing Noble Fencer off the corpse. She grabbed the girl by the shoulders and pulled, throwing her body weight into it. She might have looked delicate, but such was the difference in strength between a Silver and a Porcelain rank that she managed to dislodge the warrior.

“Excuse me, but what do you think you’re doing?” High Elf Archer demanded. “I thought we explained how this was going to go!”

Noble Fencer, now sprawled on the dirty floor, regarded the archer with dark eyes. “……I have to kill the goblins.”

“Aww, man…!”

It was no use trying to convince her otherwise. High Elf Archer pursed her lips, making her displeasure plain. Her ears stood up in annoyance amidst her disheveled hair. That unpredictability was what she liked best about humans. She had to admit she even enjoyed complaining about all of Orcbolg’s strange decisions. At least sometimes. Just a little bit…!

The adventurer who sat before her—both hands covered in blood but nonetheless a serene expression on her face—was different. How she was different, High Elf Archer couldn’t exactly say, but she found it unmistakable.

“That’s why I was against this…!”

“I’m just glad we got away without suddenly having to let off a spell… I guess,” Dwarf Shaman said, sighing and shaking the wine flask at his hip. Hearing a splash from within, he took out the stopper and took a long swig. Then he brushed droplets out of his beard and burped once. The spirits of wine were just right for a danger narrowly averted.

“This isn’t what we planned on, but we’ve got to play the hand we’re dealt.”

“Yes, I suppose there’s nothing for it. It’s better to have her with us than to leave her alone to cause trouble unaccounted for.” Lizard Priest sounded awfully calm.

High Elf Archer raised an eyebrow. “And what if she gets us caught up in something else, something even worse?” She put her hands on her hips and glared at Noble Fencer. Her anger at the young woman, who was standing there with her hands still covered in gore as though none of this concerned her, seemed to be welling up again.

Priestess, sensitive to what was going on, tried to head things off. “C-calm down, just please, stay calm! This isn’t the time to be getting angry…!”

“You should be the angriest of all!”

“Wha?!”

High Elf Archer suddenly stuck out her hand and brushed Priestess’s cheek. The girl winced involuntarily at the stinging pain. Goblin weapons might be crude, but a blade was a blade.

The red line along her cheek was still dribbling blood.

“She decided to launch a surprise attack, and you’re the one who paid for it!”

Priestess’s eyes flickered. She pressed her small hand to her cheek.

“I’m fine,” she insisted. After some consideration, the expression she settled on was a smile, one that said she could deal with a little scratch. Her brave face only seemed to infuriate High Elf Archer further.

“You’re not fine, you’re hurt—!”

At least—yes, at the very least, that adventurer could apologize to Priestess.

High Elf Archer reached out as if to grab Noble Fencer, who stood staring into space—

“Calm down.”

“Orcbolg…!”

—and found a grimy gauntlet stopping her.

The smallest of tears seeped out at the edges of High Elf Archer’s eyes. It was her agitated emotions that were to blame. She couldn’t be calm just because they told her to.

“But—but she said she’d come with us, and now look—!” High Elf Archer said petulantly, pointing at Noble Fencer. She just wanted to make herself understood.

But Goblin Slayer shook his head. “I’m telling you to calm down.”

He grabbed the murdered goblin and dragged him, robes and all, into the pool of waste. With a disgusting sound, that corpse, too, sank into the muck.

Goblin Slayer looked away from High Elf Archer, whose shoulders were heaving with her angry breath.

“Hey.”

“Oh, y-yes!” Priestess said, quickly straightening up.

“Start by attending to yourself, then give her first aid. That hand will rot.”

There was a moment’s silence, followed by a grunt. Goblin Slayer seemed to be weighing whether to go on.

Then: “There will be a scar, as well.”

“…Sure. Should I use a potion…?”

“Start with herbs.”

Priestess nodded with a “Yes, sir,” then pattered over to Noble Fencer. Antiseptic and pain-killing herbs wouldn’t have the dramatic effects of a potion, but they were still tried and true. Goblin Slayer made sure Priestess had applied the ointment to her cheek correctly, then he nodded.

“Sorry for the trouble, but please check whether there are any survivors among the prisoners.”

“On it.” Dwarf Shaman took another swig of his wine as he answered. He was always quick to respond to a call. “Come with me, Scaly. I’m going to need help if I have to drag anyone out of any cells.”

“Ha-ha-ha-ha-ha! Yes, conventional wisdom does hold that spell casters are physically weak, doesn’t it!” Lizard Priest said. Just a little joke: a way of fighting back against the oppressive atmosphere of the prison.

Touching the tip of his nose with his long tongue, Lizard Priest said to Goblin Slayer, “I presume you do not mind if we tend to the injuries of any wounded we find?”

“Save your miracles,” Goblin Slayer replied. “No matter what you do, there won’t be any prisoners in good enough condition to join the battle.”

“Indeed, a point well taken,” the lizard said, making that strange gesture with his hands.

As he departed, he whispered, “I understand your feelings, but perhaps this time emotion should be left for later.”

The elf’s ears picked up on his murmur.

“I don’t think it’s enough to just say we had no other choice and let this slide,” she said after a pause, her face in a pout. Goblin Slayer stood before her silently, his arms crossed.

Goblin Slayer felt that something was off—partly due to the “goblin priest,” a hideous and seemingly contradictory thing if there ever was one—but the prisoners were more concerning. Supposedly, no girls had been kidnapped from the village. Which meant that they had most likely been brought here from some other village the goblins had raided.

“…”

Had the goblins forced their prisoners to walk along that snowy road, then? Was that even possible?

How large an area were the goblins operating in? And was it this “goblin paladin” leading them?

“I don’t like it,” Goblin Slayer said.

He had been talking to himself, but High Elf Archer replied sulkily, “You’re telling me.” Then, making no effort to hide the unhappy twitching of her ears, she stared into his mask and said, “Why did you bring that girl along?”

The helmet left his expression as unreadable as ever, but he answered dispassionately, “Because we need her.”

“Oh we do, do we?” the ranger said, spitting out a little mocking laugh. “Well, maybe you should give her a spanking, then.”

“Whatever the case, if we don’t get out of here we won’t be able to return home. And,” he added, as calmly as always, “there are goblins to slay. We’ve taken on the challenge. We will either succeed, or we won’t.”

“This… This isn’t the time to be talking like that…!”

“…I know.”

But.

“I do…believe me, I know.”

His voice sounded uncharacteristically tired. High Elf Archer suddenly found she couldn’t speak.

“……”

Orcbolg? she mouthed silently to him.

Maybe the word didn’t reach him. He slowly let out a breath. “I’ll stand guard. Once you’re done checking the prisoners and helping anyone you can, get your equipment ready.”

“…Here?”

“That’s right.”

“………”

“I don’t think you’ll manage much fighting dressed that way,” he said to the elf.

Specifically, in a basement prison surrounded by waste and rot and corpses.

High Elf Archer muttered her agreement. She pressed a finger to her brow as if forcing back a headache. “Just to make sure I’m clear on this: here?”

“That’s right.”

“And you want us to change our clothes?”

“That’s right.”

Argh, for crying out loud. Orcbolg hasn’t changed a whit, has he?!

“Excuse me,” the archer said with a sigh, “but elves have this little thing called modesty…”

“If it bothers you, use this as a curtain.”

“Ergah?! …Gah! You!”

He had grabbed a blanket from the cage and tossed it at her; it landed over her head.

High Elf Archer’s expression of anger slipped for just a second; she quickly tried to get it back, but it was too late. Goblin Slayer already had his back turned anyway.

High Elf Archer set about tying the blanket securely around her neck, then changing her clothes underneath it. She couldn’t help feeling pathetic.

She gleefully discarded the dirty rags she had worn in her guise as a captive adventurer, replacing them with her usual hunter’s garb. She put on her armor to keep her safe in battle; slung her bow across her back; and as for her underwear…well, forget it. She didn’t understand why anyone would bother with it anyway.

Oh, man… What am I even angry about?

This wasn’t like her. It wasn’t like her at all. She slowly felt her anger ebbing away.

Huh?

High Elf Archer paused, mystified, as she inspected her armor. Orcbolg had given her the cold shoulder, and yet she was hardly even upset about it. Partly it was because she was used to it by now, but…

If that were all, I wouldn’t care about him ignoring me when it came to her, either.

“Hrrm…” High Elf Archer’s ears quivered thoughtfully as she considered this riddle.

So…there’s something different when it comes to her and Orcbolg.

What could it be? How was it different?

She turned these thoughts over and over in her mind until they threatened to stir up a whirlpool.

She still didn’t find an answer—what came to her instead was the one word the two of them seemed to share.

“Goblins.”

Goblins, goblins, goblins, goblins, goblins, goblins!

High Elf Archer found herself trembling; the word resounded in her mind like a curse.

“Ahhh, sheesh! This just isn’t good…!” She smacked her cheeks with both hands, rubbed the edges of her eyes. She couldn’t seem to center herself.

She couldn’t get these feelings to go away.

She couldn’t find an answer.

Things were at their worst.

Yes, but.

“………There really is just one thing to do, isn’t there?” She let out a groan, her ears twitching, then stuck her head out from under the blanket.

Goblin Slayer was still standing at the top of the stairs, keeping a watchful eye on the door there, his equipment at the ready.

High Elf Archer spoke softly to his back. “I’m sorry, Orcbolg.” She opened her mouth but found she couldn’t quite go on speaking. She looked for the words, then tried again. “I…lost my head a little.”

“That happens,” Goblin Slayer said, not turning around. “To you, to that girl, to me.”

His words were as calm as ever, even a little cold. High Elf Archer found her cheeks nearly relaxing into a smile.

“Even you, Orcbolg?”

“That’s right.”

“I don’t think I’ve ever seen it.”

“Is that so?”

“It sure is.”

“I see,” he murmured without much interest, then turned his head.

It was just an instant. High Elf Archer remembered something Priestess had told her once. How when he was thinking, when he was about to say something—he would go silent.

“I’ll tell everyone else,” he said quietly. “If you think I should.”

High Elf Archer poked a hand out from under the blanket and gave a reassuring wave as if to say, It’s okay.

“Nah. I’ll tell them myself.” She paused, then said, “Thanks.”

She pulled the blanket aside with a flutter, glad that the motion hid her face at that instant—hid the gentle smile that had crept onto it.

“You’re surprisingly…considerate, Orcbolg.”

“…Is that so?” Goblin Slayer murmured. Then he said, “Do it quickly. I want the other girls to change as well.”

“Yeah, yeah.”

She couldn’t see his face—and yet, High Elf Archer thought she knew what his expression was.

That was enough for her.

§

“Nobody there.”

“All right.”

When High Elf Archer popped her head back inside the door and delivered her report, the party quickly moved out of the basement prison.

The nauseating smell of goblin is not a pleasant thing. The stone castle was not a great deal less rank than the underground room, but somewhat, and Priestess took deep, grateful breaths.

“Is it really…okay to leave those people there?” she whispered.

“Safer than bringing them to stumble along behind us, I can only think,” Lizard Priest said.

Fortunately—or perhaps, as it were, unfortunately—they found several captive girls, wasted but alive. They had freed the young women, but as Lizard Priest said, it was impossible to bring them along.

And as important as he knew time and miracles were to the party, the fact that they had been unable even to heal the young women…

“We have to get back there and help them as soon as we can,” Priestess said, looking back regretfully.

“Right now I’m wondering if we can even help ourselves,” Dwarf Shaman muttered, feeling his way along the stone wall.

He was the one leading the party along. The stone fortress had no chinks or cracks, truly the work of dwarves. When pitted against some attacking bandits, the work of those craftsmen was going to tell.

The party walked along in formation now, with High Elf Archer scanning for enemies and Dwarf Shaman charting the way forward.

“Anyway, Beard-cutter, where d’you plan to go? Are we heading for the main keep?”

“No,” Goblin Slayer said, shaking his head. “It’s still too early to attack the enemy leader.”

“…”

Noble Fencer shivered at the calm declaration. To prevent any repeats of her earlier outburst, she was now second from the last; Priestess stood with her.

Ever since receiving High Elf Archer’s brief but heartfelt apology, Noble Fencer had said very little.

“Never seen a blade quite like that,” Dwarf Shaman had said to her. “It looks like quite a piece of work—but what’s that metal?”

Then, and only then, she had murmured in response, “………Aluminum…… The blade was forged from a red gem with a lightning-hammer.”

“Aluminum, is it? Can’t say I’ve ever heard of it. Mind if I have a look?”

Instead of an answer, she shot him a glare of refusal. Dwarf Shaman only shrugged.

“Hmm,” Goblin Slayer grunted. “Let us head for their storehouse first.”

“Armory, or food?”

“Both. But let’s start with the weapons.”

“Right this way, then.”

The party advanced through the stronghold like shadows, without a sound. Nobody in the group had ever carried too much in the way of noisy equipment. Only Priestess and Goblin Slayer were even wearing metal armor, and in Priestess’s case it was only thin mail. Goblin Slayer was wearing mail along with his leather armor.

The only sounds in the corridor now were the shushing footsteps of fur boots, and each of them breathing.

The adventurers brought their formation together so that they were walking in a line. They were alert for traps, keeping an eye on the area around them as well as on their companions, but they weren’t nervous, and they never let their guard down.

After all, of the six adventurers there, four of them were of Silver, the third rank. Navigating labyrinths came as naturally to them as breathing.

“…Something’s coming,” High Elf Archer said, stopping where she stood with her ears bobbing. She crouched down and pulled out her great bow, readying an arrow and drawing it back. She was aiming at the corner just ahead.

Without a word, Goblin Slayer reached for the sword at his hip, moving out in front of Dwarf Shaman. From his new position in the order, the spell caster reached into his bag of catalysts, while Priestess gripped her sounding staff. Lizard Priest swished his tail and looked easily back over his shoulder; Noble Fencer ground her teeth.

At last they heard two sets of defenseless footsteps approaching the corner.

“…”

There was only the slightest whisper of air as a bowstring was drawn. High Elf Archer’s arrow flew through space, piercing one goblin through the eye and pinning him to the wall.

“GROOAB?!” At what must have seemed like the sight of his companion collapsing against the wall, the second goblin gave a cry of confusion.

Before he ever processed what happened, a sword was growing from his throat. Goblin Slayer had thrown it at him without hesitation.

“We have to hide the bodies,” he said.

“If we have to go to all that trouble anyway, why didn’t we just hide in the first place?” High Elf Archer asked.

“This is better than if they had found us and the sounds of battle had alerted anyone else to our presence.”

He approached the corpses with his bold stride; he pressed a boot against the bodies and pulled out the sword and the arrow, tossing the latter to High Elf Archer.

“Urgh,” she said as she caught it, as if now it suddenly bothered her; she wiped the blood off quickly. The blood of a wild animal might have been one thing, but goblin blood was not something to be tolerated.

“How many spells and miracles do you have left?” Goblin Slayer asked, glancing at his companions.

“Um…” Priestess tapped a pale finger against her lips in thought. “I haven’t used any at all, so I’ve got three left.” She counted on her fingers: Kindle they had used on the road, while Communicate they had needed upon entering the fortress. “The others have both used one each, so they each have three left, so… Nine altogether?”

“Hey, now,” Dwarf Shaman said jovially. “You’re not counting our new friend there.” He pointed at Noble Fencer.

She had been standing at a distance, ignoring their conversation as she stared intently at the goblin corpses, but now she muttered, “…Two more.”

Is that all? Priestess wondered—meaning not her spells, but the words she was going to use.

Priestess furrowed her brow but said, “Thank you very much,” with as much enthusiasm as she could muster. Noble Fencer, however, pointedly continued to look away, not so much as glancing in the party’s direction.

“Hmmm…” A little mutter escaped from Priestess. The gesture reminded her of the apprentice girls at the Temple—specifically, it reminded her of the most troublesome ones.

“Anyway, that’s eleven in all, isn’t it.”

“Hmm. Certainly we aren’t anywhere near exhausting our resources,” Lizard Priest said. “I suppose you won’t mind if we make use of a charm here or there?”

“No,” Goblin Slayer said. “Consider it nine spells.”

“What’s this, then?” Lizard Priest said, blinking. “How did you get that number?”

“We should preserve our two Lightning spells.”

Noble Fencer shuddered at this. Her eyes, as clear as glass, fixed on Goblin Slayer. Her voice was thin and immensely quiet.

“………Can I…kill goblins?”

“If all goes well.”

His words were so brief. Noble Fencer continued to gaze at the expressionless helmet, until finally, she gave a small nod.

“We can’t kill any more goblins until we get rid of the ones we’ve already done in, right?” High Elf Archer, seeming to have ignored the discussion of spells and miracles, tapped one of the dead monsters with the arrow she was still holding. Despite the cold, they had only wrapped their hips and feet in fur. Crude spears were their weapons. It looked like they hardly possessed anything in the world.

“Do you have some idea how to do it?” Goblin Slayer asked, rifling through his item pouch as he spoke.

“An idea? Hmmm… Well… Oh!” Her ears jumped up eagerly. She beckoned to Dwarf Shaman with a gleam in her eyes like a mischievous child. “Dwarf, hand over your wine. The whole jug.”

“Oh-ho.” Dwarf Shaman smiled, as if there was a joke afoot. “What’s the story, Long-Ears? Looking for a little liquid inspiration?”

“Just pass it here, already.”

“Yeah, all right. There’s some left still. Don’t drink it all.”

“Don’t worry. I won’t drink it.” She pulled out the stopper with a pop and took a good sniff, frowning at the sharp smell of the spirits. “I promise, I won’t drink a drop.” And then she turned the bottle upside down and emptied the contents onto the floor.

“Oh no!” Dwarf Shaman moaned as if the world were ending. That he didn’t simply scream was testament to his instincts as an adventurer.

He did, however, look like he was going to bounce right off the ground up to High Elf Archer’s small chest as he grabbed for the jug.

“Now look what you’ve done, you stupid, anvil-chested—”

“I asked nicely, didn’t I? Now come on, this was necessary—we have to do what we have to do.”

“How is it necessary?! How can it be what we have to do?! My—my wine!”

“No, she’s helped us.” Goblin Slayer was already moving. He had guessed what High Elf Archer had in mind; now he wiped away the dripping blood with a rag and seated the corpses against the wall. He tilted the heads down so their wounds wouldn’t be obvious, and kicked the spear one of the goblins had dropped so that it rolled over to his side.

“Hrrrrrrgh…!” whined Dwarf Shaman.

“Heh! See? I helped. Oh, don’t worry. I’ll get you a new bottle later.” Looking quite pleased with herself, High Elf Archer set the wine jug next to the goblins.

“Oh…!” Priestess said. Her eyes started to shine, and she nodded in understanding. “There isn’t a goblin alive who takes his work seriously, is there?”

“That’s the idea,” the ranger replied. She winked and made a giggle deep in her throat.

Now the corpses seemed to be nothing more than two drunk goblins. The strong smell of spirits would help mask the odor of blood.

A couple of goblins who got to drinking while on guard duty and then fell asleep—surely it would be nothing remarkable.

“If we can’t keep them secret, we can hide them in plain sight,” High Elf Archer said.

“But why do we have to use my wine to do it?” Dwarf Shaman moaned, biting his nails with regret as he watched the liquid dribble along the stone floor.

Lizard Priest gave him a hearty slap on the back. “Be not dismayed, I shall treat you as well. We will need to toast our ranger’s fine turn of mind.”

Dwarf Shaman looked up at the priest with an unhappy grunt, but Lizard Priest rolled his eyes in his head.

“Do you not think so, milord Goblin Slayer?”

“I do.” He nodded. “Drinks will be on me.”

After this offer, there was really no more room for complaint. Dwarf Shaman groaned and muttered again and finally let out a deep breath.

“Hrm. Erm. Well… If Scaly and Beard-cutter both feel that way, then…”

“Indeed,” Lizard Priest said. “But for now, we must hurry. Where is the armory?”

“Sure, right. Over here.” Dwarf Shaman led the party off with a wave of his hand.

Immediately beside him was High Elf Archer, chuckling triumphantly.

“You long-eared, anvil-chested…! When we get back to the bar, you’re gonna treat me ’til your head spins!”

“Yeah, whatever. I’ll keep you watered for as long as you like, so don’t get so angry.”

And the argument went on. Priestess smiled to see them trading friendly jabs again.

Thank goodness.

In the basement earlier, there had been a real argument. It’s never a good feeling to see your comrades fight with each other. So now…

I’m really, really glad.

With that heartfelt thought in her mind, Priestess knelt down right where she was. She held her sounding staff in both hands, as if clinging to it. Lizard Priest looked at her and nodded. We’re going ahead, he seemed to be saying.

Then Priestess closed her eyes, just as she always did.

“………What are you doing?”

The voice, quiet, came unexpectedly from beside her.

“Oh, uh, I—well…” Priestess felt her heart beat faster, but she nodded without rising. “I’m praying for the repose of their souls… Although I’m doing it quickly, because we don’t have much time.”

Suddenly, she felt her hand, wrapped around her sounding staff, grasped by that of Noble Fencer. Priestess looked mystified, but Noble Fencer shook her head firmly.

“……That’s not necessary.”

“Huh? But…”

Before she could say that everyone is the same in death, Noble Fencer gave one of the bodies a vicious kick. The goblin, which had been leaning against the wall, slumped over onto the ground.

“………It’s not necessary. Not…for…bastards…like these…!”

Noble Fencer seemed to be working herself up to speak even more forcefully when it came:

“Let’s go.”

Low and sharp, blunt and dispassionate—just the way he always spoke.

They looked up and found that the rest of the party had proceeded ahead into the fortress; only Goblin Slayer had remained behind with them. His sword and shield were at the ready, and his helmet turned slowly, scanning the area.

Was he…waiting for us?

Priestess did not, of course, ask the question aloud. She didn’t need to.

He was always waiting for them. She had learned that well in the last year.

“Okay… We’ll be right there.” Quickly, but with care, Priestess closed her eyes and prayed that the dead goblins would be well in the afterlife. She stood, dusting off her knees, then smiled at Noble Fencer.

“Come on. Shall we go?”

“………”

Noble Fencer said nothing but averted her eyes, and then she headed after the party at a stiff pace.

Well, now. Her expression changing to a confused smile, Priestess scratched her cheek and shook her head. “Does she…dislike me?”

“I don’t know.” Goblin Slayer shook his own head firmly, but then the helmet cocked curiously. “Do you wish to be friends with her?”

“Hmm…” Now that the question came up, Priestess put a finger to her lips and looked at the ground and thought.

I just…can’t seem to leave these people alone.

The thought was rather, although not entirely, similar to one she frequently directed at the adventurer in front of her.

She smiled, her expression like a blooming flower.

“You know, I think I do.”

“Is that so?” He nodded. “Then you should do so.”

That was all Goblin Slayer said before he turned and walked off. Her “I will!” followed after him.

Ahead, down the dark tunnel, their companions waited for them.

The armory was not far away now.

§

Even goblins are smart enough to lock a door. Including the huge metal one they found in one corner of the stone labyrinth. There was even a step stool placed nearby, the knob being out of reach of the diminutive goblins.

“Right, time to switch,” Dwarf Shaman said.

High Elf Archer stepped up to try herself against the door. “Sure, just leave it to me…is what I’d like to say, but I’m not sure I’m that confident…”

First, she scraped the surface of the door with a bud-tipped arrow she drew from her quiver. Confirming that there was nothing there, she perked up her big ears, listening for any sound inside the room.

She didn’t hear anything moving. Given how dank and polluted this goblin hideout was, it was surprising not to hear so much as a rat scurrying around. Goblins no doubt found rodents to be good snacks—a subject she didn’t want to think about, although she had to admit she was grateful for the fact.

“I’m pretty sure there’s nothing inside… I think,” she said.

“Open it,” Goblin Slayer instructed. “Destroy the door if you need to.”

“In the worst case, we might,” Lizard Priest said. He brought his hands together in a strange gesture, then took out a dragon fang that could act as a catalyst. “We wouldn’t want any goblins sneaking up behind, so we shall act as guards.”

“Right you are,” Dwarf Shaman responded, and the three men circled up around the women.

High Elf Archer pulled a branch as thin as a needle from somewhere in her outfit and began looking for the keyhole. Her movements were small but fairly clumsy. She was a ranger, not by any means a thief or a scout. An adventurer in town had taught her simple trap disarmament and how to pick a lock—along with a touch of gambling. Granted, all of these had been very useful in satisfying her own curiosity…

“Careful now, okay?” She glanced to the side as she worked, clicking her tongue. “If you stand right next to me like that, you might get caught by any trap that goes off.”

“But I’ll also be able to give you first aid right away,” Priestess said with a cheerful smile. She had sat smack on the ground right next to High Elf Archer. She had a firm grip on her sounding staff so that she could start praying at a moment’s notice.

“Honestly, I wish I had the Precog or Luck miracles.”

Her concern for her friend High Elf Archer was only half the reason. The other half was disappointment about her own powerlessness.

“Well, it’s not your fault. It’s the deity who decides which miracles you get, right?”

It was kind of High Elf Archer to point this out, but not being able to do anything to help still stung.

Maybe the elf had a sense of what was going through Priestess’s mind, because with a trickle of nervous sweat, she said, “We really could use an actual scout here…”

“Mm,” Priestess said, “but you’re so kind as to seek out traps and pick locks for us anyway…”

We’re counting on you, okay?

At that, High Elf Archer’s ears flicked modestly.

Now, she was going to have to concentrate. Goblins might not be smart enough to build very subtle traps, but a dwarf fortress left over from the Age of the Gods might be home to more tricks than what the little devils had put there themselves.

A keyhole that sprayed poison gas, or a doorknob that grew unbearably hot were the best things they could hope for. Some doors would erase the memory of anyone who used them without intoning the proper spell.

And whether such brutal fates awaited them or not, the goblins’ cruelty was a matter of some renown…

“……”

High Elf Archer glanced back over her shoulder. Noble Fencer was staring vacantly into space.

Is she really okay?

No, of course she wasn’t okay. High Elf Archer knew she couldn’t imagine what awful things that girl had been through. It was a miracle she had kept her sanity.

Ahh, no time for that now. Concentrate, concentrate!

She bit her lip, focusing on her fingers as they checked the keyhole.

After a few minutes, she felt something give, and the lock unlatched with a clack.

“…Phew. Got it.”

“Good work” were the only words Goblin Slayer said. Even as the elf chuckled and puffed out her chest, he raised up his leg and gave the door a solid kick.

There was no reaction.

“Seems safe enough.” Lizard Priest all but slithered his way to the front of the group. Kicking the door open just in case there was anything inside was a tactic as old as time.

“Well, of course it’s safe. I checked it, didn’t I?”

“You told us yourself that you didn’t know what you were doing,” Dwarf Shaman growled, following after the triumphant High Elf Archer.

Goblin Slayer, who had continued to watch the hallway after breaking in the door, nodded at Priestess.

“Oh, light,” she said. “Coming right up.”

“Thank you.”

She grabbed a torch out of her bag and lit it as she had done so many times before.

A goblin fortress. Deep at night, a blizzard howling all around; not even the light of the stars reached them. Goblins could see well in the dark, so these conditions didn’t bother them, but not so humans. At the very least, they would need fire while they explored the storehouses…

“There, got it.”

“……”

Priestess let out a breath, a red flame dancing on the torch in her hand. It wavered as her exhalation passed over it.

Then she turned and walked up to Noble Fencer, who was looking at her intently.

“Hold on to this, okay?”

“Hold on to…what…?”

Noble Fencer was surprised to find herself spoken to; she didn’t seem to think Priestess could possibly mean her. But Priestess insisted, calmly and quietly, “The torch. Look after it, okay?”

“……”

Noble Fencer didn’t say anything, just stared at the proffered light, but Priestess took her hand and wrapped it around the base of the torch.

Noble Fencer shuddered to see a flame before her very eyes. As she looked around hesitantly, Priestess thought she saw, at the same time, a frightened little girl.

“……”

The young woman opened her mouth; a little sound escaped her as if she were trying to say something, and then she held the torch with both hands, looking into the flame.

“………I understand.”

That was all she said, in a whisper, and then she scuttled into the storeroom.

The hallway fell dark once more. Priestess, however, could feel a smile creeping across her face.

Goblin Slayer walked up beside her at his usual, almost violent pace.

“Why did you ask her to hold it?”

“Just…a hunch.”

The question was rather sharp, but Priestess’s answer was gentle. By now she could tell from his voice that he wasn’t angry.

“I thought she must be feeling…well, bored, and I didn’t want that.”

“Is that so?”

I assume you’ve got a plan anyway…

So much Priestess thought but didn’t say.

To be suddenly thrown into somewhere new, scurrying from place to place. To stand around staring vacantly, not sure what you’re supposed to do. That—that was something Priestess understood all too well. She was an orphan who had been raised in the Temple, after all. An abandoned child.

“Didn’t you notice?”

“Notice what?”

“When I gave her that torch, she was a little embarrassed.”

“Is that so…?”

With that mutter, Goblin Slayer and Priestess headed into the storehouse.

A moldy smell made their noses prickle, and dust threatened to make them sneeze. They closed the door behind them. Immediately, Dwarf Shaman jumped toward the hinges, pounding the pins into place.

“Normally, I’d leave it open,” he said with a shrug, replacing the peg and hammer in his bag. “But we wouldn’t want any nasty little monsters sneaking up behind us, now, would we?”

“Truly spoken, but now if the enemy should appear in front of us, our escape will be blocked behind.”

Someone let up a great guffaw then, but whether it was Lizard Priest or Dwarf Shaman, no one was quite sure.

“Stop it already.” High Elf Archer frowned, but Priestess joined in the chorus of laughter.

Only Goblin Slayer and Noble Fencer were silent. The young woman still held the torch, raising it slowly above her head. Every movement of the flame produced dancing shadows. In the unsteady light, Goblin Slayer examined the equipment in the storehouse.

“For an armory…” As he spoke, he casually reached into a nearby barrel and pulled something out. It was a crude pickax, cheap-looking, covered in mud and rust, obviously well used. A glance also revealed spades scattered about, and other tools good for moving earth. “…there isn’t much in the way of arms or armor.”

“You don’t think they’re just digging holes? They’re goblins, after all.” High Elf Archer sounded totally disinterested. She couldn’t have cared less about arms or armor. Instead, she had her ears up, listening carefully for footsteps from outside.

“Or perhaps they are digging for something, mining.” Lizard Priest reached out, a lazy sweep of his tail stirring the air. He picked up a spear that had fallen carelessly among the pickaxes and said, “If this so-called goblin paladin exists, I assume he has more in mind than simply enlarging his nest.”

“Makes good sense to me,” Dwarf Shaman said, looking around, but he didn’t sound happy about it. The place might have been dirty, but the stonework still boasted the delicate touch of the dwarves; no average person could have imitated it. “This is a dwarven fortress. There must at least be ore deposits around.”

“But,” Goblin Slayer said, “do goblins know how to forge swords?”

What could they possibly be digging for? Nobody had an answer.

The shadow of the goblin paladin, the enemy whose face they did not yet know, loomed over all of them.

Even Goblin Slayer was at a loss for an answer here. Who else would be able to fathom what he couldn’t?

“Whatever the case…,” Priestess murmured, grasping her sounding staff as if to push back the oppressive atmosphere. When she found she could get those first few words out of her mouth, the courage to continue welled up. “Whatever the case, if these goblins are planning something, we can’t just leave them here.”

Her resolute words produced nods of agreement from the other adventurers.

“We have to do something about these weapons and equipment, too…”

“Ahh, leave that to me,” Lizard Priest said. “I’ve a little spell for moments like these.”

He scattered some dragon fangs and made a strange hand gesture, bringing his palms together.

“Well, t’aint to be helped,” Dwarf Shaman whispered at this. “Mm. You, girl.”

“…! …?”

Noble Fencer, who had been entirely focused on carrying the torch, jumped and made a half-voiced sound in answer. She looked at Dwarf Shaman’s beard, which he stroked; he gave a small grunt and then indicated the nearby equipment with a jerk of his chin.

“Lend me a hand. We’re gonna bring out some of those weapons.” Then, as if he already knew exactly what he was looking for, Dwarf Shaman reached into the pile of mismatched equipment and pulled out a sword. “Beard-cutter ain’t exactly kind to his toys. And you’ll never get by with just that dagger.”

There was a grunt—from Goblin Slayer, of course. “I believe I use my equipment appropriately.”

“Heh-heh!” It would have been possible to take the quiet chuckle for annoyance, but in fact it was just High Elf Archer laughing.

For her part, Noble Fencer took a second to register that she had been asked to help. But when it sank in, she quickly started gathering up equipment. A sword, a spear, a club… This was all goblin equipment. But even so, she was not a large person. She might have been a warrior, but there was a limit to how much she could carry. And on top of that…

“I don’t think a goblin chest plate is going to fit you,” Dwarf Shaman declared.

Noble Fencer’s generous bust was more than could be contained by the found chest armor.

Looking on from one side, High Elf Archer gave a little snort and suggested peevishly, “Just give it a good push, why don’t you? Squeeze it in there.”

“Y’long-eared lout! A girl with an anvil for a chest might not know it, but armor that doesn’t fit is more liability than help!”

Dwarf Shaman ignored High Elf Archer’s reply of Who’s an anvil?!, instead staring at Noble Fencer.

She could use both a blade and magic, and she was wearing light armor that allowed her to make the most of both. At the moment, the only weapon she had was a dagger. Not the sort of thing that would make someone a company’s main source of firepower.

“Best start with a sword, then…”

“…!”

Noble Fencer frowned noticeably at this and backed away from Dwarf Shaman.

“Hmm?”

“……I don’t……”

Her voice was so soft. Dwarf Shaman looked at her curiously; she glared at his beard.

“……I don’t need……”

“……”

“…I don’t need…a weapon…!”

Her voice was still quiet, but there was an unmistakable note of anger. Her otherwise expressionless face began to crumple.

“Hmm.” Dwarf Shaman, perhaps a bit taken aback, blinked and fingered his beard. Then he smiled broadly, as if he had just eaten a delicious meal. “I see, I see! So you’re not interested in gear. Excellent! Now that’s the beginning of a friendship!”

“……”

Now it was Noble Fencer’s turn to be lost for words.

As she stood there blinking at him, Dwarf Shaman went on as if it were the most obvious thing in the world: “How are you going to get along, not being able to say the things you want to say? Hmm?

“At least outerwear, then,” he muttered, pawing through the contents of the storehouse.

It might have all been goblin light armor there, but it was also mostly stolen. Everything was covered in dirt and grime, but it could all stand up to practical use.

A leather overgarment. Steel-reinforced gloves. Maybe a little something metal to protect the head…

“…? …?!”

Noble Fencer was totally flummoxed to find herself swept along, Dwarf Shaman equipping her with first one thing and then another. No race could outdo the dwarves when it came to evaluating the quality of weapons and armor.

This, then that, first one thing, then another. Equipment on, equipment off, new equipment, until her head was spinning.

“Hey now, take it easy, okay? Don’t do everything at once…” Priestess offered this half-hearted attempt to save Noble Fencer, but she didn’t sound very hopeful.

She somehow came across like an older sister… Or maybe more precisely, someone who was trying very hard to act like one. She put her hands on her hips and wagged her finger, repeating, “Come on, stop.” She was trying to sound severe but not doing a very good job. “You’re only causing trouble for her.”

“Hrm…” Dwarf Shaman grunted, then looked into Noble Fencer’s face. “Am I causing you trouble?”

For a long while, Noble Fencer didn’t say anything, trying to look anywhere but at the dwarf. Silence. Then more silence. Then finally: “…………A little.”

“See?” Priestess said, trying to conceal a smile.

“Well, goodness gracious, pardon me,” Dwarf Shaman said, also trying not to grin. The way his mouth curved up a little anyway was rather charming.

He gathered the equipment together and hefted it on his back quite nimbly despite his small size. Then he glanced at the young woman.

“I’m not done saying my piece yet, though. Beard-cutter there, he’s something else, you understand?”

“Not counting his weird streak,” High Elf Archer said with a giggle she couldn’t hold in. “Orcbolg never says anything but ‘Is that so?’ and ‘That’s right’ and ‘Goblins.’”

She glanced at Goblin Slayer, who was leaning against the wall in a sullen silence, and gave a catlike smile.

Priestess offered another one of her It’s hopeless looks and said, “He is who he is.”

Finally, Goblin Slayer couldn’t restrain himself from saying, “Is that so?”

It was no bad thing for a group of adventurers like this, deep in the heart of danger, to find the ability to laugh—even if such was not one of the precepts Goblin Slayer commonly articulated.

If being serious is the way to win, he’ll be serious, Priestess thought. But if it’s not, well…it would be better if he could relax a bit…

“I’m sure milord Goblin Slayer is quite acquainted with his own habits. Now, then.” That was Lizard Priest, his hissing breath bringing the impromptu roast to a close at just the right moment. He slapped his tail once on the floor, then looked around at the group. “Is all in readiness?”

“I suppose we can save the gibes for later. All set, Scaly.”

“Mm.” The lizard nodded somberly, then made his strange hand gesture.

“O my forebears who sleep under layers of rock, with all the time that has piled upon you, guide these objects.”

No sooner had he spoken than the dragon fangs scattered on the floor began to boil away.

And then, behold: the weapons and equipment began to rust and deteriorate before their very eyes, starting with whatever was exposed to the air.

“W-wow…” Priestess had heard tell of this ability, but it was considered to be an evil miracle and so not often seen. “Is this the Rust miracle…?”

“Ah, you know it?” Lizard Priest seemed both surprised and interested by her question. “Indeed it is. Destroying objects with Weathering takes rather too long.”

“I’ve never actually seen it myself. What about our items?”

“It won’t affect us. Though this isn’t a prayer I would often call upon in battle.”

Priestess felt a rush of relief at that. The thin mail she wore under her vestments was important to her.

I know it’s a consumable, but still.

“It takes a good deal of time to prepare, but is useful at times like this,” Lizard Priest explained to her, swishing his tail as if he was rather pleased with himself. “Ahem. So we have freed the prisoners down below and destroyed our foes’ equipment. I believe everything has gone to plan so far, has it not, milord Goblin Slayer?”

“Yes,” Goblin Slayer said, nodding slowly. He took a waterskin out of his item bag, uncorked it, and drank between the slats of his helmet. “However, we must not let down our guard. There’s no telling what may happen.”

That, of course, was something all the adventurers here were fully aware of. No one in this world knew whether it was fate or chance that controlled the dice the gods rolled.

The possibility of the unexpected was precisely what made it an adventure.





The creaking and groaning of the rusty horn was violent to the ears but could be heard clearly all throughout the fortress. Given that a goblin was blowing into the pipe as hard as he could, it made sense that the resultant noise would be both loud and hideous. Or perhaps the goblins considered it to sound gallant.

They were dressed in a mismatched array of rags, many of which they had produced by tearing up the clothing they stole from the village women. They carried drums of skin and bone, which made a hollow sound when they beat them.

One after another, the goblins flooded into the central courtyard of the fortress.

“ORARAG!”

“GORRB!!”

“GROOOB!!”

They raised their fists and howled, flecks of dark spittle flying from their lips.

It was obvious enough what their excited voices meant. They were shouting out taunts, or invective, or giving voice to their resentment, jealousy, and greed. The collective hatred was turned upon all those who had what they did not.

To the goblins, it was also as if they were hailing their hero. The one who took their wishes upon himself, the one who slaughtered the foolish humans.

Goblins actually have a strong feeling of solidarity, but at the same time, they hate to take the initiative to do anything themselves. Instead, they leave everything to a chief, or shaman, or lord. That leaves them free to chase anything that glitters—literally or proverbially—be it food or drink, or women, or gear. Free to drag down those who have what they do not and cut them to pieces.

No goblin wants to die. If his brother dies, he gets angry and feels he must take revenge.

And goblins hold all this at once, feeling no contradiction.

“GORARARARAUB!!!!”

At last, an even louder voice asserted itself, and the goblin behind it appeared, his stride full of menace.

He wore a grimy steel helmet; a patchwork of metal armor covered his body. A crimson cloak—he had torn down a curtain from someplace—served as a further covering. At his hip he carried a shining silver sword so striking that to the goblins, it seemed nearly sacred.

“ORARAG! ORRUG!” The goblin paladin. At his great and somber voice, the goblins knelt as one.

Together, they bowed their heads, and a path opened among them like the parting of a sea. The goblin paladin began to walk among them, regally, his cape fluttering.

The tip of the scabbard in which his silver sword rested scraped along the ground, but he seemed to pay it no mind.

He advanced toward a huge throne, built of junk and corpses. His hideously twisted face seemed to suggest an element of pride. He could almost have looked humorous, like a caricature of a human being—but one infinitely depraved and cruel.

§

“We’ve miscalculated.”

The party had just left the armory. Goblin Slayer was looking out into the central courtyard from the hallway, clicking his tongue and not sounding very happy.

High Elf Archer gave him a quizzical look. “How so? Isn’t that the enemy boss? I could pick him off from here…”

“That you mustn’t do,” Lizard Priest said gently. “That would leave us with only a headless army of goblins, and there is no telling what they might do.” The quick-tempered archer already had a bud-tipped arrow in her bow. “But I believe that is not all, is it, milord Goblin Slayer?”

“No,” he said. Then, quietly, he added, “Can you not see it?”

“…They’re just goblins, aren’t they?”

“That’s right.”

This caused High Elf Archer to twitch her long ears, perplexed. This wasn’t making sense to her, nor was she sure what they had miscalculated. Yes, there had been some hiccups in the plan, but she felt it had gone pretty well overall…

“That goblin is the master of this fortress.”

“…?”

“This is a ceremony. They’re going to present ranks or awards.”

“Oh!” It was not High Elf Archer, but Priestess, who exclaimed. She clapped a hand over her own mouth, then peeked at the courtyard from the hall. Thankfully, none of the goblins seemed to have noticed over the grating sounds their ugly little band was making.

Priestess put a hand to her chest in relief, and then with all seriousness, she gave the answer.

“There’s always a priest at ceremonies like this…!”

Indeed. If this ceremony followed typical goblin style, the priest would be called forward.

Whether or not the priest was involved, that was still the goblin paladin before them, the creature who had apparently received a handout from the god of external knowledge.

But as far as that goblin priest went…

“…………Oh.”

A tiny, shaking voice escaped Noble Fencer’s lips. Her lovely face went slightly pale. She clenched her fists, her arms still wrapped in bandages. What had those hands of hers done? What had she done with them? On a whim? In the caprice of a moment?

Her eyes wavering, she looked from one member of the party to another.

“Well, he’s not far away,” Dwarf Shaman said as if nothing much were going on. “But he’s permanently indisposed.” He stroked his beard with one hand, reaching into his bag of catalysts with the other; his expression was seriousness itself. “I suppose this might be a bit of a problem.”

No one could say anything in response to his whisper.

They all understood the situation they were in.

Even a cursory glance at the goblins in the courtyard suggested there were more than fifty monsters there. And the adventurers were right there with them. What would happen when the goblins discovered their presence?

Goblin slaying is as old as time; it has been taking place since the world was born. And whenever it does, the goblins have always outnumbered the adventurers.

Those heroes who are unprepared, who challenge the goblins blindly, are killed. All the more so when they try to give battle in the very heart of the nest.

Goblin Slayer was no exception to this rule.

How was this odd adventurer with his strange ways going to make up for the difference in numbers? They had been adventuring together for close to a year. There was no way she wouldn’t know.

Then it happened.

“…O-ow…!” Noble Fencer, her hands still clenched, went stiff and grunted in pain.

“Wh-what’s wrong?” Priestess approached her almost automatically, checking for injuries, but she saw no obvious wounds. But…

“Hrr-rrr-ghh…gah…”

“Sh-she’s so hot…!”

Noble Fencer’s skin was hot to the touch, seemingly almost enough to burn.

“What’s going on?” Goblin Slayer asked.

“I—I don’t know. But this…”

Remember. Think back. Priestess desperately searched her memory.

There were no external injuries, and it wasn’t likely to be poison. Heat in the body. Almost as if a spell had been cast on her.

A spell? No. This was no simple magic. And there were no totems here. A paladin. A cleric.

Divine punishment… A curse. A curse?

“Oh…!”

Priestess looked down at where Noble Fencer’s recently shortened hair revealed the nape of her neck. The cruel brand burned into the skin there, the eye of the green moon, was shining brightly, as if aflame.

“It’s…!”

“Haah… Hrrrgh… Arrgh…”

Noble Fencer writhed, sinking her teeth into her own arm in hopes of suppressing her groans of pain. Priestess held on to the warrior’s burning body for dear life, looking up at Lizard Priest. He was Silver-ranked, the most experienced cleric there. Now he let out a hissing breath.

“A curse from the evil gods! I must dispel it. No, we’ve no time…!”

They had been careless. They had considered the brand to be nothing more than another example of the goblins’ vile cruelty.

Now they understood: it was because of the curse that even a healing miracle had not been able to erase the scar.

“O Earth Mother, abounding in mercy, lay your revered hand upon this child’s wounds!”

Even so, there was no time to dawdle. Priestess implored the Earth Mother to give them healing. The merciful goddess brushed the girl’s neck with her finger, pitting herself against the curse that resided there. But…

“GORUB?!”

“ORARARAGU?!”

All at once, a hubbub began to spread among the goblins in the courtyard.

The adventurers saw that the ceremony was proceeding apace; now the monsters were only waiting for their priest and his sacrifice.

But he didn’t appear. He did not come.

After a moment, the goblin paladin muttered, “ORG,” and sent a lackey scurrying off.

He was no doubt headed for the basement prison. He would find the priest’s body, along with the freed prisoners—it was only a matter of time.

“ORARARAGAGA!!” the goblins shouted, the collective noise growing in strength.

The goblin paladin jumped up and howled out what seemed like a bizarre prayer. “IRAGARAU!”

“Hrraaaaaaahhh!” Noble Fencer bellowed, no longer able to fight the pain.

Then everything happened at once.

Looking into the courtyard, Goblin Slayer grabbed his sword. The goblin paladin was looking right at him.

Their eyes met. One gaze hidden by a steel helmet, the other a pair of golden pupils. And then—

“ORAGARAGARAGARA!!!!”

“Get down!”

At the goblin paladin’s command, archers turned and let loose a volley of arrows with sickening agility. At the same moment, Goblin Slayer dove to the side, catching the two girls as he went.

“Eek!”

“…?!”

Priestess exclaimed; Noble Fencer made no sound but was obviously startled. Goblin Slayer ignored them, raising his shield.

Thop, thop, thop. A limp sound rang out as the arrows showered against it. Goblins are not strong creatures to begin with; when they had to fire upward, the fact was only magnified.

Goblin Slayer picked up one of the arrows; he found the head was only loosely attached. And yet, the little monsters were trying to make the arrows work over a long distance.

“A poor imitation.”

A hollow sound of metal accompanied the continuing rain of arrows. Goblin Slayer grunted, throwing away the bolt in his hand as if it interested him not at all. Then he looked back at Priestess and Noble Fencer, keeping his shield up to protect them as he spoke.

“Are you all right?”

“Oh, uh, y-yes. Thank you.”

“It’s no problem.”





“……”

Noble Fencer said nothing, averting her eyes from where she lay under Goblin Slayer’s chest, but she nodded.

“Good.”

That was enough. He looked next at where their companions were located some distance away.

“What about you?”

“Fine, somehow!” High Elf Archer said.

“In danger of getting crushed, though,” Dwarf Shaman said with a wave.

Lizard Priest had spread-eagled himself and leaned back over the elf and the dwarf to cover them.

“Well, now, this has become a fine thing, hasn’t it?” he said, narrowing his eyes happily despite the hail of arrows around him.

To the lizardmen, such crises were considered trials, and trials were to be undertaken with joy.

“We’ll split into two groups,” Goblin Slayer said.

“Excellent idea,” Lizard Priest said quickly. “Three and three: a warrior, a spell caster, and a priestess. Then a priest, a ranger, and a spell caster. Yes?”

“That’s fine.”

“Which shall be the bait?”

“I’ll do it,” Goblin Slayer said. “A tank is most suited to that job.”

“And my physical strength most appropriate for carrying the former prisoners out of the basement. Understood!”

“Good.”

Their quick, quiet conference over, the strategy was set. There was no one who could best Goblin Slayer at slaying goblins. Nor could any race outdo the lizards when it came to the arts of war.

“Then let us put this plan into motion. Mistress ranger, master spell caster—will you be able to come with me?”

“Yeah, sure,” High Elf Archer said. “But—gosh! Look at the form they use shooting those arrows! It just ticks me off!”

“Save it,” Dwarf Shaman advised her. Then the three of them began to creep down the hallway, using Lizard Priest and his mighty scales as a shield.

Goblin Slayer nodded. Now all he had to do was make himself noticeable.

“All right. Let’s go.”

“Oh—yes…!”

“…!”

But Noble Fencer stood silently, not moving. Or rather, she couldn’t move.

The pain was part of it, the feeling that her neck was burning. She was curled up and sniffling quietly.

But that wasn’t all of it. The fingernails of the fists she had closed so tightly had broken through her bandages, and now blood was flowing.

“You… You mustn’t do that, okay?” Priestess approached, gently placing her hand over the fencer’s. The two willowy, delicate hands went together naturally, entwined with each other.

Noble Fencer shook slightly.

“………I…”

The thinnest of voices escaped her.

“…know… I……know that. I kn……ow.”

She shook her head, waves rippling through her honey-colored hair, as if to drive something away.

“But………” She couldn’t seem to get out more than that; the rest wouldn’t come. “…But…!”

Then the dam broke, words and tears spilling out in equal measure.

The regret. The regret. The pain. The sadness. Why had it all happened to her? It wasn’t…

It wasn’t supposed to be like this. All of them—impulsive. Laughing at her.

Making fun. And yet… She was wretched. Unable to do anything. Pathetic.

It was her fault again. Her fault that things…had ended like this.

The sword. She had to get it back. She had to. Give it back. Give it back.

I want to go home.

Father… Mother…

“I can’t… I can’t stand this anymore…!”

“…”

Goblin Slayer and Priestess were silent. The string of words made scant sense to them.

Noble Fencer was sniffling and snuffling like a child coming down from a temper tantrum. Goblin Slayer listened carefully as she desperately strung words together. From inside his metal helmet, he looked intently at her tearful, snotty face.

And then he thought:

Out of all that the goblins steal, how much can really be gotten back?

“Is that so?” he said then. “I understand.”

“…Huh?”

Noble Fencer looked up at him, uncomprehending. She looked at Priestess, beside her.

“…Gosh,” Priestess said. “You really are hopeless, aren’t you?” Sigh. She didn’t rise from where she crouched between Goblin Slayer and Noble Fencer.

“—is what I cannot say.”

Now it came out. Again. But he did understand, didn’t he?

“Goblin Slayer, sir, I’ve told you, you can’t just answer everything with, ‘Is that so?’!”

“Is that so?”

“See? You did it again.”

“………Is that so…?”

Priestess’s smile was like a blooming flower; he pointedly averted his gaze.

“I will get back your sword.” Then he stood up, his shield still at the ready. The storm of arrows continued to bounce off it. “And I will kill that goblin paladin. Along with the other goblins.”

He drew the sword at his hip. It was a strange length. “I don’t mean one or two of them. I don’t mean an entire nest. I don’t mean even this entire fortress.”

The grimy helmet. The cheap-looking armor. The adventurer who wore them.

“I will slay all the goblins.”

So do not cry.

At these words from Goblin Slayer, Noble Fencer sniffed mightily, then gave a small nod.

§





“O Earth Mother, abounding in mercy, grant your sacred light to we who are lost in darkness!”

That great light broke upon the goblins like the dawning of the sun.

It was Holy Light, granted by Priestess’s soul-enervating prayer.

At this distance, it wouldn’t be enough to blind the targets, but—

“ORARAGA!”

“GROAAB!!”

—it was more than enough to get the goblins focused on one group of adventurers while another snuck into the fortress.

The goblin paladin spat out an order, along with several dark flecks of spittle, and the goblins began to move. The arrows continued to come down, while a unit of goblins marched out of the courtyard. Presumably, the plan was to pin down the enemy with arrows while advancing their own troops. That much was clear enough.

“While we have their sacrifice, however, they can’t afford to act too aggressively,” Goblin Slayer said, holding up his round shield to protect the young woman behind him from the incoming bolts.

The arrows bounced off the shield and scattered on the ground nearby. He stepped on and destroyed them mercilessly.

“It feels good to be the one with the hostage for once.”

Goblin Slayer glanced back at Priestess and Noble Fencer, then turned to securing a path.

“Here we go. Keep low.”

“Oh—yes, sir! Should I use Protection…?”

“No,” Goblin Slayer said. “Save it.”

Priestess had only one miracle left. And it never paid to misjudge when one should use one’s spells or miracles.

Priestess nodded obediently, but her smile was somehow mischievous. “All right,” she said, then, after a beat: “But if it gets dangerous, I’m using it.”

“I’ll trust your judgment.”

The words set her heart dancing: He trusts my judgment!

It made her so happy to hear that one word, trust, from Goblin Slayer.

“Yes, sir!” she said earnestly. Goblin Slayer nodded at her, then looked at Noble Fencer.

“Can you run?”

“………Probably.” It was the honest answer. The girl was rubbing at the reddened corners of her eyes. All the emotions she had been holding back had come bursting out, and maybe she was feeling differently now. Her expression was still transparently frozen, but now the glass beads of her eyes had a light in them.

“All right.” Goblin Slayer pulled a torch out of his bag, struck a flint, and lit it. He thrust it at Noble Fencer. She took it in a firm grip, blinking at the bright flame.

“You’re our rear guard. Keep us safe.”

“……Okay.” She nodded with a serious expression. Something soft embraced her left hand. She looked up in surprise, to see—

“It’s going to be fine.”

—Priestess, smiling like an open flower in front of her.

“We’ve come this far. Do you think we’re going to let ourselves be defeated now?”

“…Mm.”

Noble Fencer squeezed Priestess’s hand. Then they set off running, and the battle began.

Whether or not the enemy realized it, the arrowheads on all the goblins’ arrows were loose. Nor were the tips covered in poison. Maybe this was an effect of the earlier battle, or perhaps they just held a grudge. But in Goblin Slayer’s opinion, they were simply trying to ape him, and doing a poor job of it.

The device of the loose arrowheads caused the arrows to shake, lowering their accuracy. What were the goblins thinking, trying to fire such bolts from a distance? Long-range shooting was already difficult for goblins, weak as they were. Now they were using missiles whose tips would break off when they hit anything. An unprepared amateur might be vulnerable to such tactics, but the arrows would hardly even damage anyone with halfway decent armor.

Still, it was convenient for him. The goal of his group was to buy time. To be the bait. They were supporting their allies. Every goblin they could get to pay attention to them was one step closer to victory.

That, of course, was assuming that Lizard Priest and the others could pull off their part of the plan.

“This is going to get harder and harder to handle alone.”

“Goblin Slayer, sir! They’re coming! Six—no, seven!”

Priestess sounded a warning as if to confirm the mutter that escaped him.

Ahead of them: a group of goblins was running along the fortress walls toward them, golden eyes glittering in the dark. They held clubs and spears and axes with which to beat the adventurers, trample them, tear them apart, violate them.

“Hmph.”

What Goblin Slayer did was simple.

He drew his sword as he ran, then flung it.

“GAROAB?!”

One goblin suddenly found himself with a sword through his neck; he clutched his throat as if drowning as he tumbled from the battlements, disappearing into the blackness.

The remaining goblins were not, of course, especially intimidated by this.

Look. That stupid adventurer just threw away his weapon. Attack! Kill! Tear them to pieces!

But that was their mistake.

“First, one. Next, two.”

“GARARA?!”

The shield in his left hand came up, shattering the skull of the goblin in front. The shield’s honed edge was a weapon in itself, and it did its job brilliantly.

Warding off the gruesome spray of his enemy’s blood, Goblin Slayer picked up the creature’s stone ax.

“Three!”

So long as goblins attacked him, Goblin Slayer would not be without a weapon.

The merciless stone ax came flying at the heads of the third and fourth creatures, splitting them open just like their companion earlier.

“ORAG?!”

A fourth. A fifth. A sixth. Trading one weapon for another and then another, he slaughtered goblins with each breath.

The goblins were unable to use their numbers to their advantage on the narrow battlements, something the little monsters had yet to understand.

The adventurers pushed ahead against the goblins, who crashed against them like a hideous tide.

Of course, Goblin Slayer didn’t deal with them all single-handedly.

“GRARAB!”

One creature used its small size to dodge to one side, making for the women.

“Take this!”

“GARO?!”

But Priestess rebuffed him firmly with a swing of her sounding staff. The damage it did was minimal, but it was more than enough to stun him.

“Why, youuu!”

“ORARAG?!”

And a stunned goblin was easy prey for Noble Fencer. She swung the torch like a burning club and sent the creature tumbling from the walls.

Her shoulders heaved, but her eyes were looking into the darkness.

“They’re coming from behind, too!”

“How many?”

“…I’m not sure.” She bit her lip. “But it’s a lot!”

“All right.”

Goblin Slayer casually withdrew a bottle from his bag and launched it behind him. It flew over Priestess’s and Noble Fencer’s heads with the sound of a passing breeze, landing directly in front of the oncoming goblins.

There was a clatter as the ceramic jar broke; the viscous liquid inside went everywhere. Noble Fencer had probably never seen or heard of this liquid, but Priestess remembered it.

It had many names: Medea’s Oil, petroleum…and gasoline.

“GARARARA?!”

“ORAG?!”

There were other ways to kill an enemy besides personally cutting them down. The goblins slipped and slid on the slick stuff, falling from the ramparts. With all the creatures shoved together on the top of the wall, this was only to be expected.

Still, goblins would be goblins. They trampled over their fallen comrades and got past the gasoline, throwing themselves at the adventurers even if their numbers had been somewhat reduced.

“GRARAM!”

“…Hi-yaah!”

Noble Fencer swung at them energetically. The torch looked like a great red brush, showering sparks as she painted the night with it.

One goblin took a blow and fell off the wall. The second came leaping at her. She met it with a strike from the torch. The third was already upon her, threatening to sneak past to one side.

“Leave him to me…!”

It was Priestess. Noble Fencer had no time to answer as she dealt with the fourth goblin, whom she beat repeatedly until he stopped moving.

Yes, but now the fifth, and the sixth were—

I can’t keep up…!

Her arm as she wielded the torch grew heavy, her movement slow; her breath became strained and her vision clouded.

She could hear the sound of her own breathing, her own blood pulsing. There was a ringing in her ears, making it hard to hear.

Noble Fencer glanced over her shoulder, seeking help. But Priestess was whipping her sounding staff around as fast as she could, trying to drive back the mass of oncoming creatures.

“Curse you…!” she was saying. “There’s…always so many of them…!”

Goblin Slayer was just beyond her, and it would be no use hoping for help from him.

Noble Fencer could feel rancid goblin breath on her pale cheek; they were getting very close.

“Oh…”

The humiliation and hopelessness she had experienced on the snowy mountain returned vividly to her memory. The awful reek of the goblins. The implacable hands. The unrelenting violence and cruel greed. The simpleminded grins.

The thought made her body go stiff, her throat constricting with terror. Strength came into her hands.

But in her left hand was an unmistakable warmth; in her right, an unremitting light burned.

A scene flashed before her eyes, of Goblin Slayer in the basement prison, fighting his fight.

“…Ah…ahhhh!”

There was an instant where her body moved faster than thought, flinging the torch at the goblins.

“GAROARAARA?!”

Unfortunately—or perhaps somewhat fortunately?—her target was one of the goblins who had already crossed the gasoline. Flame billowed across his skin instantaneously, and he fell off the battlements still writhing in agony.

“GROOOB!! GRAAB!!”

Always, however, goblins trust to their numbers. Another simply surged forward and filled the gap.

“Hrrraah…!”

Noble Fencer brought her fist around in a backhand. In her hand she had concealed the aluminum dagger, with which she stabbed the creature.

“GAROARAO?!”

“D-damn you…!”

The dagger buried under the monster’s clavicle was enough to end his life; she kicked the corpse away, pulled out her blade, and looked up again.

Suddenly, she found the tide had broken. This was the pause, the few precious seconds before the next wave rolled in. Noble Fencer inhaled deeply, steadying her breathing.

She was sure she could never have done this a few minutes ago. Spurred on by anger, weapon in hand, throwing herself at the horde of goblins without a thought for either the past or the future. And…

“Huff…puff…huff…”

But then there was Priestess. Even as she gulped air, she refused to let go of Noble Fencer’s hand. Her fingers were slim and pretty, and yet—and yet, warm.

“……”

Noble Fencer regarded the hand silently. The urge to wade in among the goblins was not enough to make her extricate herself from Priestess’s grip. After all, Goblin Slayer, who had rescued Noble Fencer, had entrusted her to Priestess.

“Thirteen… Well done.”

The man himself spoke without so much as a glance in her direction and tossed her a new torch. She just managed to catch it, using the moment’s peace between onslaughts of goblins to light the thing and get a good grip on it.

She looked briefly at Priestess’s face; sweat was running down her forehead and her features were stiff with nervousness, but still she gave Noble Fencer a smile. Noble Fencer reflected that she probably looked much the same herself.

She knew that, for better and for worse, people could change dramatically in the space of a single moment.

§

“How’s it looking up top?”

High Elf Archer casually shot another goblin, then glanced back at her friends.

There were goblins inside the fortress. Not as many as on the walls, but enough to make combat unavoidable. The sounds of fighting reaching the elf’s ears intensified, but she took comfort in the fact that she didn’t hear any human screams.

“Ah-ha! You’re worried about Beard-cutter, aren’t you, Long-Ears?”

Dwarf Shaman chuckled, pulling out a wineskin and taking a swig. With his lips wetted, he wiped a few drops away and smirked at his companion. “Wish you were up there yourself, do you?”

“Not especially. I’m not worried about Orcbolg at all.” She sniffed as if the subject bored her, then drew another arrow from her quiver. “It’s the other two I’m concerned about.”

“Concerned the new girl is going to take him from you is what you are! Awfully childish.”

“That’s not what I’m worried about!” Her ears stood up straight and she glared at the dwarf. Perhaps she realized she had come on a little strong, because her next words were much more gentle, almost shy. “…They’re my friends. Is it wrong to worry about them?”

“Ain’t nothing wrong with it.”

“Huh?” High Elf Archer blinked, taken aback to hear the dwarf agree with her so readily.

“You’re an elf. A big, important friend!”

So he was just teasing her after all. But then, he was praising her, too, or so it seemed. She wanted to get angry but couldn’t quite bring herself to do it. And yet, she couldn’t just roll over and take this, either. She settled for a growl and a glare in the dwarf’s direction, but he ignored her and took another mouthful of wine.

“Ha-ha-ha! Now, if milord Goblin Slayer were here, there would be no need to argue.” Lizard Priest watched the two of them with a jolly expression, his tongue slipping out of his mouth with a hiss.

He was actually the youngest among the three of them, but he never tired of watching the elf, who acted so much younger than she was.

“Now, then. It will avail us nothing to chat and chatter here. How much farther?”

“Not far to the room we’re looking for,” Dwarf Shaman said, wiping his beard with a gauntleted hand. He put the cap back on the wineskin and tapped on the wall. “Frankly, it’s going to be a bigger job getting back to the prison once we’re done there.”

“Oh,” said High Elf Archer, sensing an opening, “I thought dwarves were as brave as they were fat. Not so?”

“Watch it.” Dwarf Shaman’s movements were somber, his shake of his head serious. “I look as good as I do because I’m so brave. Unlike you. I can hear your knees knocking from here!”

“Why, you…! Dwarf! Wine barrel!”

“What’s that, anvil?”

“Ha! Ha! Ha! Ha!”

Now, of course, the three of them might be bantering, but they weren’t standing around wasting time. Fewer enemies for them meant more were assaulting their friends. They had no time, and half their usual fighting strength. A single wrong move born of panic could render everything for naught.

The fact they could be so alert and yet make no mistake was testament to who they were. It was why they had no time for unnecessary anxiety. Yes, sometimes it was possible to succeed despite nervousness. But it was crucial to keep chatting, stay relaxed, do the job as if it were nothing out of the ordinary.

In fact, not a single goblin they’d encountered had escaped. Between High Elf Archer’s arrows and Lizard Priest’s claws and fangs and tail, none of their enemies were breathing any longer. On top of that, Dwarf Shaman’s guidance was true; he found them the shortest, quickest routes.

“This’ll be it.” They had arrived at another great, thick dwarven door. Dwarf Shaman was sniffing the air as if checking something, then he nodded and turned back to High Elf Archer. “All right, switch off.”

“Yeah, sure. Let me at it.” She tapped him on the shoulder and switched places, then pressed herself up against the door. She took out her needle-branch and quickly checked the keyhole, searched for traps, and set about the business of picking the lock.

As she did so, Dwarf Shaman and Lizard Priest busied themselves keeping an eye out for enemies. Each of them was holding his favorite weapon—a Swordclaw for one, a sling for the other—and scanning the area vigilantly.

There was no sign of goblins yet. They could be grateful for the way the dice were falling.

“Hey,” High Elf Archer said with a twitch of her ears. She was working her needle industriously, finally producing a click from the lock. “Are you sure this is gonna work? Not that I’m doubting you, but it’s already failed once…”

“Got to admit, I’ve been worried about the same thing. What do you say, Scaly?”

“One failure does not mean the plan has no merit.” Lizard Priest stepped forward as High Elf Archer slid nimbly back from the door. Anyone would be pleased to have such a stalwart companion as Lizard Priest among them, especially when assaulting a fortress full of goblins.

“It has always been the way of those attacking castles to flood the place, but there is another possibility.” He kicked the door in and looked around, then opened his jaws and smiled like a naga. A nearby barrel was filled to the brim with something—chunks of what appeared to be smashed-together ants.

“And that is to starve the enemy.”

§

Fwoosh. It was at that moment that a gout of flame went up from one corner of the ruined castle.

“ORARAGA?!”

“GROAB!!”

Even the cruel goblins, loyal chiefly to their own greed, were surprised at this, making sounds of confusion.

The deathmatch with the second wave was over; they were on to the third wave now. Around them, fifteen or sixteen goblins stopped cold as they saw their provisions go up in flames.

“Good.”

Goblin Slayer was not one to waste such an opportunity. He was already diving out of the way along the castle wall, barking orders. “The torch—throw it forward! Now!”

Noble Fencer gripped the torch that was her weapon, looking at the ground for just an instant. And then, this time decisively rather than reactively, she flung the little handheld flame.

By now, even she knew what she was aiming at. The torch fell in an arc, and tongues of flame began licking up along the path. The gasoline Goblin Slayer had thrown down earlier became a wall of flame, blocking the goblins entirely.

“GROAA?!”

One unfortunate creature caught in the blast was turned into a living torch; he thrashed on the ground for a moment before lying still.

Confronted with his terrible death, the goblins were not about to try to jump through the flames, however angry they might be. Some stories tell of courage that fears not even death—but this is the furthest thing from the mind of goblins.

“Twenty-nine. It’s about time.” Goblin Slayer threw away his brain-smeared club and took the sword from the goblin corpse at his feet. He gripped it, tried a few moves, then nodded. “We withdraw. Get ready to—”

“Goblin Slayer, sir!” Priestess shouted a warning. Without it, his adventure would likely have ended there. He whipped the sword back instinctively, and it went flying out of his hands in a shower of sparks. A white line traced itself across his sternum, between his helmet and his armor.

“Damn…!” Goblin Slayer jumped back instantaneously; there was a flash of aluminum in front of him. It was no enchanted sword, no sacred blade. And yet, it would not have been out of place in the hand of a hero.

“GRAAORRRN…!”

A goblin stood there, smoke rising from his armor and flames from his eyes. He had jumped through the wall of fire; he was like a messenger of the gods, sent to bring low his enemies on behalf of his brothers. With his aluminum sword in his right hand and a teardrop-shaped shield in his left, he looked like a caricature of a holy warrior.

The goblin paladin.

“You’re late,” Goblin Slayer said calmly. He leveled his sword, which had been reduced to the length of a dagger. It was his usual stance: shield high, hips low, wrist rotating until his sword was pointed at his enemy. “But I expected you eventually.”

“GAROAROB…!” The goblin paladin moved his equipment-laden hands in strange gestures, making some unknown sign. It was easy enough to infer that he was making a show of praise to the Outer God, who resided upon the green moon.

“…Haa…ahh…!” When Noble Fencer realized who he was, a strangled scream slipped out of her. The brand on her neck grew as hot as burning. The sign of the Outer God started to pulse. It had begun to swell—as if it might burst at any moment…

With that image in her mind, her knees began to shake. And yet she never took her eyes off one thing—the silver sword that the goblin held.

That’s mine. Mine… It was stolen from me…

And it was pointed at her—she was surprised to find herself using this word—comrades.

“Ahh…n-n-no…!”

A sound of footsteps came closer. The goblins, heartened by the appearance of their champion, had surrounded the walls as they closed in.

There was no escape. Had they cornered the paladin or been cornered by him? Would it all end here?

What should I do? What should I—?

“Hurry.” A calm, almost mechanical voice cut through her confusion. “I’ll buy you time.”

“Yes, sir!” Priestess replied immediately in a ringing tone.

Noble Fencer bit her lip. A dribble of blood came from her nape; she could feel it running down her neck.

But she was all right. She was sure of it. She would make herself all right.

“…Right.”

The actions the two girls took next were diametrically opposed.

Words of true power overflowed from Noble Fencer’s mouth. “Tonitrus…oriens…! Thunder…rise!”

Priestess, for her part, prayed to the goddess, but did not invoke a miracle: “O Earth Mother, abounding in mercy. May your protection be upon us…”

This was because both of them had been told by Goblin Slayer that he would trust them.

Trust one to protect Priestess. Trust the other to use Protection at the right time.

“IRARAGARU!!”

“…Hrk!”

The goblin paladin sprang into action, babbling a prayer to his bizarre gods. The blow of his sword was swift and sharp, easily knocking away the shield Goblin Slayer had brought up to meet it.

Smite human!

Goblins as a whole tend to be of small stature. Hobgoblins excepted, they lack physical strength. The aluminum sword, however, helped make up for that. In the hand of this creature, Goblin Slayer saw now, it was a thing to be wary of. If it was enhanced by miracles from the Outer God, typical armor might well be useless against it.

Enchanted armor might be a different matter, but Goblin Slayer disliked such things. The very situation he was in made it clear what could happen if such items fell into the hands of the enemy.

“Hmph.”

Goblin Slayer’s sword work was nonchalant but masterful. Locking blades would not be the key here; he could tell that would be pointless. He would have to strike his opponent’s sword from above, forcing it down, and then use his foreshortened blade to stab at any opening.

It was not very adventurer-esque, a technique more suited to a rough and deadly duel on the outskirts of some little town. He didn’t expect the goblin paladin, who had most likely learned his swordcraft by studying adventurers, to be able to respond.

Even for Goblin Slayer, though, this opponent was too dangerous to simply try to force his way in. He took a blow with his shield, jumping far back, then brought his sword to bear, the opponent’s weapons striking out. He pushed the sword down, leaped forward strongly, letting the momentum carry him into the thrust, stabbing.

The difference in body size, in physical power and equipment, strategy, and experience, put a decisive end to the exchange.

But not the battle. That would be decided by something entirely different: two delicate young women against fifteen incoming goblins.

One look at the monsters’ cruel smiles made plain the greed, the fantasies, in those little brains.

“Heh-heh.”

And yet, despite that, despite all that was going on around her, Priestess had a little smile on her face.

The man who had her back. The one who had entrusted his back to her: she knew him, and he never did his most serious fighting in situations like this. Nor had he ever had her use her miracles at moments like these.

So now was not the time. The moment for Protection would come, but this wasn’t it.

Which meant that what she needed to do right now was come up with a plan of escape just as quickly as she could…

She looked quickly through her equipment and took out a particular item, as they’d discussed beforehand. Beside her…

“…Iacta! and fall!”

…the Lightning spell was completed.

It drew a beeline directly from Noble Fencer’s outstretched palm to… Well, one would expect the goblin paladin, wouldn’t one?

“AGARARABA?!”

“GORRRBB?!”

But no. Her attack struck the oncoming horde.

“Ee—yaaaahhh!”

In that instant, the battlefield went white. There was a tremendous noise of rushing air, such that one might imagine this was what the howl of a Thunder Drake sounded like, and then the lightning came crashing down.

The goblins scourged by the flash swelled up and exploded, screaming.

To use a powerful spell against close-packed enemies was a standard tactic. White smoke, carrying the acrid stench of cooked flesh, rose up, mingling with the smoke from the fire. Noble Fencer couldn’t resist a passing thought: that this place was hell embodied.

“…Take that…!”

The smile on her face was an unsteady one, an attempt to look strong, to be sure; but there was no question, the girls had done it. Priestess brushed a hand across her sooty, sweaty face and shouted, “Goblin Slayer, sir! It’s okay!”

“…!”

Goblin Slayer’s reaction was immediate. He spun the broken sword around in his hand so that he held it in a reverse grip, then without a moment’s hesitation, he flung it at the goblin paladin.

“GARARAI!!”

Believing this to be just a too-clever little trick, the paladin raised his shield and deflected the blade. But he also blocked his own line of sight.

It was just an instant. But it was all Goblin Slayer needed.

“Hwah?!”

“…Ah!”

The two young women cried out: they suddenly found themselves held aloft, one under each of Goblin Slayer’s arms as he jumped gracefully off the battlements.

It was just before dawn; a gentle light was beginning to spread across the land. They floated through space.

A biting cold wind rushed across the girls’ skin, sharp as a knife.

Then the sense of floating, of falling down, was arrested as abruptly as if they had hit the ground.

But they hadn’t. Goblin Slayer’s hand gripped something firmly.

The Adventurer’s Toolkit.

There was the slightest sound of heightened breathing from inside the steel helmet. Goblin Slayer, it seemed, had an uncharacteristic smile on his face. “‘Never leave home without it,’ they say…”

The hook-and-rope.

Something Priestess—an Obsidian rank, just one step up the adventuring ladder—carried religiously. The hook was buried firmly in the fortress wall, the rope hanging down to the outside; what better escape route could there be?

“IGARARAROB!!”

They looked up to find the goblin paladin leaning out over the wall, bellowing, his face twisted in anger.

Goblins lived primarily underground. He had, they presumed, never before seen someone escape by jumping from a high place.

The monsters couldn’t counterattack immediately, but their nasty intelligence was more than enough to set them straight to work dislodging the hook.

Not that Goblin Slayer would let them, of course. With Priestess and Noble Fencer clinging to him, one to each side, he braced his feet against the wall and began his descent in a series of great jumps. His movements were quick and sure, obviously the product of focused training.

“A-aren’t we heavy…?” Priestess asked.

“A little.”

The question had just slipped out of her, and she frowned a bit at the answer. She blushed and felt a touch of anger at him. It was only natural that a girl her age should shoot back at him: “You’re supposed to say, ‘No, you’re perfectly light’!”

“Is that so?”

“It is!”

“I see.”

Goblin Slayer nodded, although chances were slim that he really understood what she was upset about.

At almost the same moment as Goblin Slayer put his feet on the snowy ground, the rope was severed, falling down after them. He collected it and wrapped it around his shoulder.

“I’ll pay you back later.” It was an odd moment to think of such social niceties, but so characteristic that even Noble Fencer felt a slight smile coming to her face.

But this wasn’t over yet.

“IGURARARARABORR!!”

The goblin paladin, mad with rage, let out a yell that echoed around the mountain, knocking snow from the ramparts. With many a creak and clatter, the great main gate began to open.





They had to move quickly, or they would find themselves right back where they had begun.

“…Where are the others?” Noble Fencer asked.

“They’ll be here soon.”

And so they were. There was a crunching noise as the snow-covered ground began to rise up, then the rest of the party popped out from beneath the earth.

“Phew! Ahhh! I’m going to be well and truly tired of goblin tunnels when this is over!” exclaimed Dwarf Shaman, crawling out of the hole like a mole.

“Up you get,” he said, reaching back down into the tunnel and taking someone’s hand. With no small display of delicacy, he helped High Elf Archer to the surface.

“You’re not kidding,” she said, dusting herself off and frowning. “I can’t believe you dwarves can live underground. Are you sure you guys aren’t related to goblins?”

“Pick up those long ears and listen to me, you two-thousand-year-old anvil. There are things you can joke about, and things you can’t.”

“Two-thousand-year-old what? Are you looking to start a war, little man?”

And they were off and arguing. It was just their usual banter, but it had started so suddenly that Noble Fencer was completely lost.

“…Er. Ahem…”

“All according to plan,” Goblin Slayer said.

“Just so!” a scaly head said, popping up out of the ground. He looked rather monstrous but crawled out easily. “Worry not. Sad their state may appear, but they are unharmed.”

As intimidating as he looked, Lizard Priest also seemed happy. Two wasted prisoners hung under each of his arms, four in total. He had physical strength enough to move effortlessly despite carrying them all, and the first aid that had been administered to the women was exemplary as well. It appeared that, indeed, there was no need to fear for their lives.

“Thank goodness…” Priestess let out a relieved breath, tears springing to her eyes. “I was worried about all of you. Are you hurt?”

“Not a scratch!” High Elf Archer said, briefly interrupting her argument with Dwarf Shaman. She puffed out her chest proudly. “What about you? You didn’t suffer, did you? I mean, at the hands of Orcbolg…”

“Oh… Ha-ha-ha-ha. No. We’re all right. No trouble at all.”

“Well.” High Elf Archer gave a satisfied nod to see Priestess’s brave smile. Then she looked at Goblin Slayer and finally at Noble Fencer. The battle was over; the girl was covered in blood and dust, yet she looked back at the ranger with eyes that shone with light.

The elf gave a slow flip of her ears, then smiled like a cat.

“You did it, huh?”

She bumped Noble Fencer on the shoulder with her fist. The girl put her hand to the spot, blinking. Then she looked down, as if to hide the tears in her eyes, and said simply, “Yes.”

“Well, you can see this is none of it any trouble for us,” Dwarf Shaman said, stroking his beard proudly and chuckling.

And in fact, that was the truth.

The Tunnel spell might have seemed only a way of moving rocks and dirt, but without it, they could not have saved the prisoners. Nor could they have done it without Lizard Priest’s strength to carry the girls out. Lacking High Elf Archer’s sharp senses, they might have had to fight many more goblins.

They had stolen the goblins’ weapons, destroyed their provisions, saved the prisoners, and then taken on the fortress’s monstrous inhabitants. Goblin Slayer could only imagine how much time and trouble it would have demanded alone.

“Ahem, well then, Beard-cutter,” Dwarf Shaman said, squinting. “What happened to your sword?”

“I threw it.”

The blunt response elicited a smile and a “That’s what I thought” from the dwarf. “Well, pick whichever one you like. They’re all goblin stuff, but that ought to suit you.”

“Thank you, that helps. Although I will probably just throw it away again.”

“Ahh, don’t worry about it!”

Just salvage anyway. He held out a bundle of swords, the weapons they had stolen from the armory earlier.

So the goblins had stolen them and kept them for a while—only to have adventurers steal them back. Goblin Slayer found it rather an odd thought. He picked the weapon whose blade was the most familiar length to him. He slid it into his scabbard without hesitation. There was no question he felt a bit off without arms.

“So all we’ve got left to do is get that girl’s sword back, is it?” Dwarf Shaman said.

“Right.” Goblin Slayer pulled a jar from his item pouch: a stamina potion.

He popped the cork and drank it in a single swallow. The warmth that spread through his body felt good.

He had saved this item, something Guild Girl had given him before he left, for a special moment.

Goblin Slayer looked at his companions: At Priestess, the girl who had faith in him. At High Elf Archer, who stuck with him through thick and thin. At Dwarf Shaman, who could be relied upon in the most dire circumstances. At Lizard Priest, to whom he entrusted his safety in battle. And at Noble Fencer, who had given her all to persevere until this moment.

Each of them was covered in mud and blood and ash, but here they were.

Then he looked to the horizon. The frontier town was away south. Cow Girl was there, waiting for him to come home. Guild Girl was there.

There were more and more things in his life that he simply couldn’t do alone.

This thought crossed his mind, followed soon after by the conclusion that this was, most probably, fine by him.

In that case, there was only one thing to do.

The same thing he always did.

“We’re going to slay all the goblins.”

§

Goblins have no concept of industry, of creating things with their own hands. Added to that, they had lost dozens of their brothers in this most recent battle. They would have to avoid being depleted any further, save up supplies.

To fill out their ranks, however, they would need wombs. Wombs and food.

In order to capture females and steal provisions, they would have to attack a village.

And in order to attack a village, they would have to gather their fighting strength, maintain it, move it, and strike at the right moment.

All these things were stolen. Their women were kidnapped, their weapons purloined, their food taken by force.

We can’t do anything—we can do nothing! This makes no sense. We are the ones who steal; they are the ones who are stolen from.

This? This makes me no different from the others.

Adventurers burst into my nest and take what is mine—that makes me nothing but…nothing but a goblin!

“GOURRR…”

The goblin paladin, much more intelligent than any of his comrades, could tell that everything was over. With things as they were, the surviving goblins could hardly be expected to continue to obey him.

Goblins had a strong sense of camaraderie, but what bound them together was greed. They killed those they hated, raped them, stole from them, humiliated them in the most awful ways. What else would a goblin do?

Now there was no way forward; the goblin paladin’s plans lay in ruins.

In that case, there was only one thing to do.

The same thing he always did.

Attack the adventurers. Kill the men, capture the women. Then he would chain them up in his dungeon, feed them the flesh of their own comrades, and force them to bear children until their hearts broke and they died.

Goblins did not understand that they might face reprisal for stealing, might be paid back. They only understood that they had been victimized and would have their revenge.

“IRAGARARARARA!!”

Thus, all that followed was a burst of rage.

§

The light of dawn fell on the burning fortress, a silvery sheen that glinted off the mountain upon whose slopes all this happened.

The gleam of the sun and the summit together fell upon the adventurers as they ran along. Even so much as a slip in the snow would have been fatal. Because, as it happened, they were being pursued by a group of crazed goblins hell-bent on killing them.

“IGARARARARAU!” The goblin paladin raised his aluminum sword high, howling a prayer.

“GROAAAB!!” The goblins behind him shouted in response, shaking their weapons and rushing forward. Their eyes were burning, and dirty saliva dripped down from their mouths.

Every shred of rationality was gone now, if indeed they had ever had any.

Lunacy: it was a miracle of battle granted by the god of external knowledge.

The goblins who followed the great paladin were caught up in a whirlpool of insanity. They spared no thought for past or future; their only desire at this moment was to rend the adventurers apart, to crush them underfoot.

The goblins, transformed into a holy army, literally knew no fear. Not even when arrows began to rain noiselessly down upon those in the vanguard, felling them. The goblins simply trampled the corpses into the snow, their zeal undiminished.

“This is why I hate goblins. Numbers are the only thing they’ve got!” High Elf Archer drew a bud-tipped arrow with a delicate movement, letting it loose even as she turned back to quip to her friends. Despite her failure to aim carefully, the arrow couldn’t miss its mark.

A skill so sufficiently developed was indistinguishable from magic.

“Then again, I do love these big open spaces for shooting! None of those cramped interiors!”

“Just watch what you wish for…!” Dwarf Shaman snapped.

“If you’ve got breath to talk, then you’ve got breath to run! Faster!”

“I’m runnin’! Fast as I can!”

The dwarf’s stubby legs made him the slowest runner in the party, even when he was going flat out. Then again, the entire party was moving somewhat slower than normal.

“What about you?” Dwarf Shaman asked. “How’s that leg holding up?”

“Honestly? It still hurts a bit.” Her leg, as slim as a deer’s, had been hit with an arrow not that long ago. High Elf Archer squinted one eye shut in distress, then loosed another bolt.

“I aver that at this rate, I do believe they will catch us,” Lizard Priest said. His movements were slowed by the cold, and needless to say, he was still hauling the former prisoners. He had summoned a Dragontooth Warrior and entrusted one or two of the girls to it, but it was not much faster than he was.

“The enemy ranks have thinned. I might recommend allowing me to face them alone.”

“N-no! You can’t!” Priestess, not normally so confrontational, shook her head vigorously. “It’s one thing to do something outrageous or unbelievable when it helps you win, but it won’t work this time…!”

One wondered if she realized she was all but repeating one of Goblin Slayer’s favorite sayings.

A stamina potion helped somewhat, but it could not completely restore physical strength. They had left the village, marched through the snow, spent the entire night assaulting a fortress, and were now engaged in another battle without ever having had the chance to rest. Fatigue dulled the mind, a dull mind led to mistakes, and mistakes, in this case, led to death.

“Gracious… Were it just slightly warmer, I could at least move more effectively.”

“No, you mustn’t—oh.” Priestess recalled something she had in her bag. She dug into her pouch and pulled out a ring. “This is the ring Goblin Slayer gave me, the one that bestows Breathe. It won’t help much, but—”

“Anything is more than nothing. I receive it gratefully.” Lizard Priest was still running, still carrying the prisoners, but he managed to slip Priestess’s ring onto one scaly finger.

The moment he did so, he made an impressed sound; the effect was that immediate and noticeable. It was not, however, enough to significantly change the situation.

What to do now?

Only one of them had large-scale firepower. Noble Fencer allowed the magical power to begin flowing through her.

“I’ll use Lightning to—”

“No.” Goblin Slayer rejected the plan forthrightly. “There will be a time to use it, but not now.”

“…?”

Noble Fencer gave him a questioning look as they ran along. His face was, as ever, hidden behind his mask, and she had no idea what he might be thinking.

He slipped off his gloves, massaged his fingers as if to loosen them up, then put his gauntlets back on.

“I’ll take rear guard. You back me up.”

“Right on it!” Dwarf Shaman said, as surely as a hammer forging a sword. Backup and support were what spell casters excelled at. “What’s snow but water? And what goes better with water than dirt?”

He spun like a top, barely glancing at the goblins as he slammed his hands down on the snowy ground. In each hand was a ball of mud, which would be a suitable catalyst.

“Gnomes! Undines! Make for me the finest cushion you will see!”

With a shlorp, the ground softened up. The snow melted away before their eyes, turning into water; it mixed with the soft earth and soon became a field of mud.

Snare: so long as it was cast in the opposite direction, it wouldn’t affect the adventurers. It caught only the goblins.

“GAROBA?!”

“ORAG?!”

The first creatures to arrive would tumble, flailing their arms, their feet stuck in the mud. They would then promptly be trampled by their companions. It would serve to reduce the enemy’s numbers slightly and slow them down a bit. Or should have.

“ORAGARARAU!!”

At that moment, however, the goblin paladin’s prayer rang out across the battlefield. And behold! The goblins, surrounded by a pale light, walked easily through the mud!

“Wh-wha…?!”

Dwarf Shaman was agog at this. Such a thing would never have happened were their opponents ordinary goblins. But these had a goblin paladin to lead them.

It must have been the Counterspell miracle.

“Gaaah!” Dwarf Shaman exclaimed. “Stupid, sneaky goblins!”

“Looks like we’ll have to let my arrows do the talking,” High Elf Archer said, launching a bolt at the oncoming goblin army. It flew in between the ranks of the monsters, as if threading a needle, straight toward the paladin…

“GAROARO?!”

“…Oh!” High Elf Archer clicked her tongue. Another goblin had jumped in front of the leader, sacrificing himself. “Ahh, darnit! I had him just where I wanted him, too!”

“The enemy numbers have been reduced. I’ll switch with you,” Goblin Slayer said, moving quickly to the back of the formation. With a casual swipe, he beheaded a goblin who had gotten too close.

He threw his sword at the next oncoming creature, kicking a spear at his feet up into his hand.

“Eight, nine.” He gave a thrust to check the weapon, then glanced over his shoulder and resumed retreating. “We can’t go straight into the village with them behind us. I recall there was a valley on the way.”

“If memory serves, it’s not too far,” Lizard Priest said.

“We’ll go there, then.”

He looked back, flinging his spear. It pierced the chest armor of a goblin up front, pinning him to the snowy ground.

“What’d I tell you, Beard-cutter?”

“Sorry.”

Dwarf Shaman pulled another sword out of the bundle he was carrying and tossed it to Goblin Slayer. Fighting this way, leaving the enemy corpses—and their equipment—behind, was tricky because it meant a less steady flow of armaments.

Goblin Slayer cut down one or two goblins, then, when the blade became dulled with fat and blood, he flipped it into a reverse grip.

“Hrk…!” There was a muffled crunch as he used the hilt and handle to crack a goblin’s skull. He held the blade in gloved hands, wielding it like a hammer, killing the goblin in a single blow.

“Thirteen!”

He wiped the brains off his improvised weapon and moved to strike the next monster. The whole hilt ended up buried in the chest plate of the goblin’s ostentatious leather armor; the creature fell so heavily that Goblin Slayer simply let go of the sword.

“Right, next one!” Dwarf Shaman called. “You want the pickax or the shovel?”

“Does it matter?” High Elf Archer shouted. “Just pick one!” It was her speed and skill that bought them the time to switch weapons; she drew three arrows from her quiver and fired them almost faster than the eye could see. Three goblins were shot through almost simultaneously and died so quickly that they didn’t even cry out as they collapsed to the ground.

That made sixteen.

Goblin Slayer didn’t hesitate. “I need something long.”

“That’d be the shovel, then!”

He caught the spade Dwarf Shaman tossed to him, swinging and striking with it, thrusting, the goblin corpses mounting.

Trying to make the most of the precious time they had been bought, the two young women moved around behind Lizard Priest.

“Just keep moving…!”

“…ngh.”

Priestess said. Noble Fencer only made a grunt of exertion.

“My thanks…!” Lizard Priest said. The girls were pushing him along from behind with their small bodies. As for the Dragontooth Warrior, silently carrying the prisoners, the party had never been so grateful for the familiar.

Goblin Slayer, wielding the shovel like a spear, slew another goblin.

“Nineteen!”

Six adventurers and four rescued prisoners against a veritable tidal wave of goblins led by a paladin: that was the nature of the fighting retreat down the snowy mountain. Everyone involved was utterly committed, ready to battle to the death. Their breath showed white in the chill air, obscuring their vision. Their feet were beginning to go numb from the snow, yet their bodies were hot.

The sword had brought down twenty goblins, then High Elf Archer’s arrows raised the total to twenty-four; Goblin Slayer had picked up an ax for the twenty-fifth and twenty-sixth, then thrown a hatchet for twenty-seven, which was followed by another arrow.

This battle, which had begun with the rising of the sun, had so far yielded thirty goblin corpses, and showed no signs of stopping yet. The halo of morning light shone on snow streaked red with goblin blood, running in great lines as if it had been laid down by an artist’s brush.

The struggle was desperate; it would not end until one side, adventurers or goblins, had been killed to the last person. That was the grim truth of goblin slaying.

“Go on ahead,” Goblin Slayer said as they came to the mouth of the valley.

The words as such might sound like he was volunteering to sacrifice himself, urging the others to leave him behind and escape while they could. Yet there was no sound of anything so tragic in his voice, which was as cool and dispassionate as ever.

“I will break them here.” His declaration elicited a look from the entire party.

“Can—can you indeed?” Lizard Priest asked. He had shifted his two prisoners so he was holding them in front of himself. If the need became great, he could shield them with his back.

“I can. I have no intention of letting them reach the village.”

After this brief answer, Goblin Slayer nodded at Dwarf Shaman. The dwarf gave a weary chuckle and shrugged. “Sorry, Beard-cutter, that was my last weapon.”

“Then, milord Goblin Slayer, take mine.”

“Thank you.”

In place of one of Dwarf Shaman’s armaments, he received a fang blade with Sharp Tooth, a sharpening spell, cast upon it. It was the fourth and final miracle Lizard Priest could perform.

High Elf Archer, who had been firing shots as fast as she could load them, let out a sigh. “I’d like to back you up, but… Do you happen to have any arrows, Orcbolg?”

The elves were friends of the forest; if there had been so much as a leafy branch in sight she could have made a bolt for herself. But in the whole silvery-white world, there was no tree to be found.

“Use my sling,” Goblin Slayer said, pulling a bag out of his item pouch even as he gave the fang sword a few tentative swipes.

High Elf Archer caught the bag out of the air, hearing the sound of rocks inside as she did so.

“I’m not much for slinging…” There was a frown on her face and a droop in her ears. Still, she knew she had no choice, and she wrapped a stone in the sling.

“You don’t like it because you’re no good at it,” Dwarf Shaman said with a chuckle. “I think it’s time I piled on the spells myself, Beard-cutter. What do you say?”

“I doubt there’s any purpose in continuing to conserve them. Do as you see fit!”

Dwarf Shaman laid down another Snare. The goblin paladin would simply use Counterspell again, but at least he would be forced to waste one of his miracles. It wouldn’t slow down the horde much, but it might buy the adventurers just a few precious moments…

Goblin Slayer was taking a deep breath in when Priestess ran up.

“Goblin Slayer, sir, here’s a potion…”

“Thanks. Save your miracle.”

“Of course. You trusted me to know when to use it.”

He popped the cap off the bottle she handed him and drank it down. As he did so, Priestess busied herself checking the fasteners of his armor, brushing away any snow or dirt that might impede his movements. Then she made a sign and began to pray.

“O Earth Mother, abounding in mercy. May your blessings be upon us…”

This prayer would lead to no miracle; it was just a prayer, a benediction. Yet Goblin Slayer by no means saw it as useless or meaningless. He had never been so arrogant as to refuse anything that someone might do for him.

He tossed the little bottle into the snow as he felt the effects of the potion spreading through his body. He tilted his steel helmet as if unsure what to say; he stared at the goblin horde growing ever closer.

Finally, he said only, “There is a way.”

“Yes, sir,” Priestess replied. She didn’t question him: not out of love, or dependency, or blind obedience. It was simple faith—a belief in Goblin Slayer, the man before her.

He returned the level gaze she gave him. And then he nodded. That was enough.

“I’ll leave it to you when to use Protection. And…” His gaze drifted slowly toward Noble Fencer.

“……”

Her generous chest heaved as she sucked in breath, but she was getting her breathing under control. Preparing to use magic, perhaps. Goblin Slayer could guess that much.

No need for him to spell out the details, then.

“When I give the signal, fire.”

She nodded, sending a ripple through her honey-colored hair. He added one or two things further. At first Noble Fencer looked at him without comprehension, but then she said, “…I understand.”

That was all he needed to hear.

In just a short time, he had done what needed to be done.

Now, there was nothing more to do.

Goblin Slayer looked up at the sky. Were the heavenly hands still rolling the dice up there?

“Let’s begin, then.”

No sooner had he spoken than Goblin Slayer set off at a run through the snow. He was heading for the goblin army. The party nodded to one another, then started to get distance, rescued prisoners in tow.

Rocks from High Elf Archer’s sling went whistling by. One, then two. She was unpracticed at it, but goblins went down under her barrage, and that was enough.

Then Goblin Slayer’s inevitable opponent emerged.

“IGARURUARARA!!”

The goblin paladin.

“Hrmph!”

“IGRUAA!!”

So battle was joined a second time. There was a ringing of metal on metal as their swords met, sparks scattering over the snowy field. The paladin’s aluminum sword beat down Goblin Slayer’s outstretched fang blade.

Fwsh! At their feet, snow rose up like haze. The paladin rushed at Goblin Slayer again, but the warrior swept his attack aside and drew back. Goblin Slayer thrust in retort, but his blade was slapped down again by the aluminum sword.

“So you’ve learned.”

“IGAROU!”

Goblin Slayer kicked snow straight in the howling goblin paladin’s yammering face.

The monster fell back, blinded and gibbering. Goblin Slayer dealt him a blow with his shield.

However, a ringing of metal was the only result.

The goblin paladin had a shield as well. He was hardly making the most use of it, but he had brought it up in time to repel the attack.

“…!”

“GROOB!!”

The two of them shoved their shields against each other, circling. Their breath came out swirled and white.

Goblin Slayer had the advantage in physical strength, but the paladin’s small size was intimidating in its own right. The creature struck out at Goblin Slayer’s shin with his sword, but the adventurer jumped back, out of range.

He kept his eyes fixed on his opponent, whose breath steamed, even as he fought to keep his footing on the slippery snow and adjusted his grip on the hilt of his weapon with one soaking hand.

“GRARAB!!”

“Hrk?!”

There was a muffled thunk, and an arrow bounced off his head. It must have come from one of the goblin archers—their army was getting closer.

This was why a helmet was so important.

He shook his head to clear the echo of the impact, then took stock of the situation.

“Where’s your honor?!” High Elf Archer demanded, letting loose another rock. It flew over the archer’s head, striking the goblin behind him. The elf clucked her tongue and fired another missile, this time nailing her target in the shoulder, breaking the bone.

“GRAORURURU…!”

She was hardly in a position, however, to keep the entire goblin horde at bay. The army was watching the goblin paladin’s fight, but that was only because it proved an amusing diversion for them.

It did not mean that the effects of Lunacy had worn off. They were simply waiting, secure in the knowledge that whether the adventurer was victorious or was killed, the outcome would not change. Goblins naturally had no sense of what we might call the “knightly virtues.” Their logic was dictated only by the changing circumstances in front of them. Whether victory or defeat awaited this challenger, they would fall upon him the moment the combat was decided.

He didn’t have time to waste.

“Well, then,” Goblin Slayer muttered. He spun his blade around in his hand, dropped into a low stance, and raised his shield. The goblin paladin recognized this posture; he gave a hideous smirk. No doubt he remembered their earlier battle. Goblin Slayer’s round shield was facing him, edge out.

“ORAGARARARA!!”

He uttered a terrible war cry and set upon Goblin Slayer. His aluminum sword was at the ready. It would pierce this half-hearted defense easily.

Behold! Yes, see the sword tip bury itself in Goblin Slayer’s shield. See how easily it passes through this confection of leather and wood and cloth!

It goes through the shield, tearing the arm, piercing the gauntlet, stabbing flesh. Blood runs down the edge of the blade, dribbling onto the snow and turning it pink.

The aluminum sword struck true, even tearing into Goblin Slayer’s shoulder.

The goblin paladin heard the soft groan of someone trying to suppress pain. He smirked, thinking he had won.

“You fell for it.”

But in fact, it was the end for him.

The aluminum blade went no farther. He put all his strength into it, but he couldn’t make it move.

It was the hilt. The hilt of his sword, heavy enough to double as a war hammer, had become lodged in Goblin Slayer’s shield.

“Hr—grr!”

“ORAGA?!”

And in a simple contest of strength, no goblin could hope to overcome a human. Goblin Slayer pulled the sword-pierced shield back, practically taking the goblin’s arm with it.

It would be more correct to call it the shield he had allowed to be pierced. Otherwise—otherwise, why would he have deliberately revealed his best killing move to the goblin paladin? Why would he have attempted to intercept and attack with his shield even after his own sword was broken?

“Goblins are stupid, but they are not fools.”

For the first time, the goblin paladin saw his opponent’s face. Deep in the darkness within that steel helmet, he saw an eye glowing red.

“But you are a fool.”

“AGARARARARA!!”

Goblin Slayer twisted his fang sword, ruthlessly tearing out the paladin’s throat.

There was an eruption of vile goblin blood, polluting the silver world. Goblin Slayer, who had twisted his body to protect the aluminum sword, was drenched in the gore.

“GORA, U…?!”

“GROB! GROB?!”

He stared at the goblins, who stood frozen with fear there in the valley.

There was no better moment than this. This was precisely the time he had been waiting and hoping for.

“Fire!” he yelled.

“Tonitrus…oriens…,” Noble Fencer responded. And then: “…iacta!”

Lightning flashed out.

The mountain shook.

The air expanded as electricity shot through it, but the lightning did not fall on the goblins. Everyone followed the spidering bolt with their eyes, up and up.

The lightning struck the summit of the mountain.

There was a rumble and a great shaking.

That could only mean one thing.

“H-hey, that’s a mite dangerous, isn’t it?” Dwarf Shaman said with a frown.

“I’ve got a bad feeling about this,” High Elf Archer added, long ears twitching nervously.

They surely understood: this would well and truly do in the goblins.

“Mm,” Lizard Priest nodded knowingly. “It seems it has come.”

A violent noise like the drums of war, or like the hoofbeats of an approaching army, was coming toward them. And indeed, death, clad in white, was stampeding down into the valley.

It was an avalanche.

“…!”

The voiceless sound of surprise, and the scream, might have belonged to either High Elf Archer or Noble Fencer. The one who exclaimed “Oh, for crying out loud!” was probably High Elf Archer.

“GARAOROB?!”

“ORARAGURA?!”

Uttering unbearable howls, the goblins were swallowed up by the onrushing snow. There was nothing they could do, no chance to run; they left not even footprints.

In the midst of this chaos, one person jumped forward, acting faster than any other: it was Priestess.

Now. The word came into her mind like a revelation.

There was no hesitation, no reluctance. She clutched her sounding staff and offered up the soul-shredding prayer to the gods.

“O Earth Mother, abounding in mercy, by the power of the land grant safety to we who are weak!”

The white tsunami smashed against an invisible barrier, parting neatly to either side.

From within the miraculous protection granted by the Earth Mother, she looked at him.

He was so far away. One man, alone, among the goblin army, outside of the Earth Mother’s miracle.

She wanted to raise her voice, raise her hand, even though she knew they wouldn’t reach him…

“Goblin Slayer, sir!”

Then the white wiped out everything; all vanished from view.

§

“…Is—is he—?!”

She was the first to get up when it was all over: Noble Fencer.

Now that Protection had faded, she had to shake the snow off as she rose.

Everything was white. The snow had obliterated every trace of the fighting and killing that she and the others had wrought. Not so much as a whisker of the goblins remained; they were vanished utterly, as if she had only dreamed them.

“…Where is he? Where’s Goblin Slayer…?”

She looked around, looked behind herself. There was no hint of that distinctive armored form. Instead she saw Priestess, holding onto her staff, her breath heaving. She saw her comrades.

Priestess tapped a frozen but thoughtful finger to her lips and looked at the foot of the avalanche. “I guess he must be underneath it all, having been swept up by the snow.”

Goblin arms and legs could be seen poking like dead branches out of the snow that had slid into the valley.

“Probably,” High Elf Archer said with a nod and a frown. Her ears twitched slightly, once, twice. “Snow is still sliding around in the distance. We’d better not talk too loud.”

“In that case, we’d best go walk to meet him, I would say,” Lizard Priest said, clearing the white powder off his body with one great shake. He checked that his party, along with the former prisoners and the Dragontooth Warrior who was holding them, were uninjured, then he made a strange palms-together gesture.

Thanks be to my forebears. All the more so as he had heard that it was a great cold that had buried them.

“As the avalanche was not so large, I don’t imagine he has gone far,” he said.

“……You aren’t…worried about him?” Noble Fencer asked.

“Of course we are,” Dwarf Shaman replied easily. “He’s our friend.”

He stroked his beard, pulled a wineskin out of his bag, and took a gulp. Fire and spirits were the way to warm the body. Then he gave a pointed wink.

“But… Well, you understand by now, don’t you?”

“This is Goblin Slayer we’re talking about,” Priestess said, a helpless smile crossing her face.

Even with this testimony, Noble Fencer found she couldn’t accept this.

Step by unsteady step, the party worked their way down the mountain, searching as they went. It was quiet now, much the opposite of their fighting retreat shortly before, but the path they were taking was enough to make one faint. With every step she took, Noble Fencer felt an oppressive weight settle on her.

If I hadn’t said that I wanted my sword back…maybe he wouldn’t have felt the need to do that.

It’s my fault.

My fault.

All of it… All of it my fault.

“…ngh…”

Now that everything was over—or rather, now that she was thrown into this circumstance so suddenly—she began to appreciate the full import of what she had done. Her arrogant strategy. The deaths of her friends. The attack on the village. The delay in rescuing the prisoners. And Goblin Slayer.

She should have been able to do better than this. Even just slightly. Things shouldn’t have ended in this abject failure.

Go back to the beginning: if she hadn’t become an adventurer at all…

Her eyes, staring at the ground, began to blur; it grew hard to see.

And yet, she just made out something moving.

“Oh…!” She didn’t mean to make a noise; she clapped her hand over her mouth.

Something was crawling on all fours through the snow. It must have noticed them coming, because it responded abruptly—by shaking off the snow and rising to its feet. It was a man.

“I made a mistake,” he said.

He was wearing grimy leather armor. A cheap-looking steel helmet. He had no sword at his hip, and the shield on his arm was shattered.

“I should have been more worried about the impact than about suffocating.”

Mistake or no, however, Goblin Slayer appeared perfectly calm.

“…G-Goblin…Slayer…?” Noble Fencer could hardly be blamed for the note of disbelief in her voice.

“Yes. You need something?”

“Is that all you’ve got to say?” High Elf Archer asked in exasperation.

“Hmm… So you’re safe.”

“That’s my line… I’ve got to admit, I thought it was weird that you just happened to bring along rings for breathing.” The elf pressed her brow as if fighting a headache. But her ears bobbed happily.

Suddenly it made sense to Noble Fencer. She looked at her hand. A magical ring, its effect long since expired, peeked out from among her bandages.

The Breathe ring.

Snow was just water, so… So…

“…Did you know all of this would happen, all along?”

“To an extent.”

“Goblin Slayer, sir,” put in Priestess, “I’m used to the fact that you are who you are, but…” She concluded in a mutter, “You could have at least let us in on the plan,” and looked at him reproachfully. “I know you said you wouldn’t do anything outrageous, but I was still pretty surprised.”

“Don’t be silly.” Goblin Slayer was on all fours again, digging in the snow as he spoke. “Our enemy was an intelligent goblin. What if someone had let something slip, undermining the plan?”

“Who cares about what-ifs? We were worried about you!”

“Hrk…”

“Will you please tell us what you’re going to do, starting next time?”

After a pause, he said, “I understand.” That was his whole answer. The rough voice readily suggested a sour expression beneath the helmet.

Quite suddenly, Lizard Priest let out a happy hiss, a smile spreading across his jaws. “Goodness, milord Goblin Slayer, it seems your famous strategies don’t work on our dear cleric.”

“You said it, Scaly! Even your nagas aren’t as scary as a woman scorned!”

“Ha-ha-ha-ha! Even so! Even so. You speak true, master spell caster.”

The dwarf and the lizard laughed together. They were tired, but their faces were cheerful.

High Elf Archer only shook her head, looking away from them and into the distance. Noble Fencer followed her gaze to find a clear blue sky and a sun so bright it was hard to look at.

“There’s about a million things I’d like to chew him out for,” High Elf Archer said, a smile just touching her lips. “But this is the way an adventure has to be.”

Adventure.

The word cut Noble Fencer to the quick.

Go on an adventure—sneak into a monster nest—work your way through a maze…

The friends with whom she had first attempted such things were gone, and she had only just met the friends she was with now.

I see… So this was an adventure…

“Hey.”

“…!?”

Surprised, Noble Fencer spun to look at the source of the unexpected voice.

“I found it.” Goblin Slayer stood up again, holding something he had pulled out of the snow.

The scabbard gleamed brightly in the sunlight.

With a nonchalant motion, he pulled the aluminum sword out of his shield where it had become lodged. He shook it to clean off the blood—his own blood—then wiped it gently with a rag.

Finally, he put it into the scabbard he had found with a click.

“I was able to hold on to the sword, but the sheath was carried away with the goblin paladin, who still had it at his hip.”

“……Oh…oh……”

“I think an avalanche was a mistake.”

“…oh…sniff…”

Noble Fencer took the proffered sword in both hands; she could feel the weight of it. Her vision blurred even further; she blinked several times to clear it. Then she rubbed her eyes furiously, but no matter what she did, she couldn’t stop herself. She wiped her nose, but that didn’t help, either.

Droplets of water began to fall on the sword, bouncing away.

Goblin Slayer watched Noble Fencer very seriously as she stood weeping. Dispassionately, almost mechanically, he said, “You do cry a lot.”

Noble Fencer clung to the sword and wept with all her might.





Is it over? Could it be over?

Illusion and Truth finally take their eyes off the board, look slowly up at each other.

They look at the board again, then at each other, then at the board one more time, before slowly starting to smile.

There’s a clap as they high-five each other.

Illusion is beaming, and Truth has his arms proudly crossed, looking quite satisfied.

One must not think that the gods desire to torment adventurers or people or monsters.

The gods sometimes fail, or the dice turn against them, and they may fume and rage.

But even so, an adventurer, confronted with a villain, is quick to assail them.

No doubt the feeling is mutual.

Now—the adventure is over. A resounding success!

They will speak of the deeds of the adventurers. They will praise the hearty fighting of the monsters.

They will admire how terrible the traps were and how clever the adventurers who escaped them.

With Truth and Illusion so joyful, the other gods assemble around them.

Chaos is there, and Order. Fear and Time, even Death and Void!

It’s a celebration, a great commotion, a blessing.

No one knows if it is Fate or Chance who decide how the dice fall.

There are good results as well as bad.

Those that inspire joy as well as sadness.

Some results give victory to the adventurers, some to the monsters.

Though one may struggle and strive to discover a treasure chest, sometimes the result means one fails to open it.

Such is life.

Cry or laugh, the number of pips on the dice won’t change.

All the more reason to adventure.

And is there anything more wonderful than that?





“All riiiiight! We made it another year without dying!” It was near dawn, and Guild Girl’s excited voice rang through the crowded tavern. “To thank the gods of fate and chance, order and chaos—let’s have lots of fun today!”

“Haaaaaappy New Year!” the adventurers cried with a great shout; they raised their cups and toasted and drank.

Truly an inspiring sight.

All the adventurers in town were gathered at the Guild tavern, practically overflowing from the place. Today, the long winter was finally over, and the new year was beginning, moving all and sundry to raise their voices.

“I’m telling you, I did all kinds of things this past year!”

“So, you did.”

Spearman was busy enumerating his many brave deeds, muttering into his drink. Beside him, the voluptuous Witch gave a sensuous smile.

“I beat the crap out of stuff with my spear, I slayed a bunch of monsters, even got some experience with magic.”

“I am, most aware.”

“And that’s why you shouldn’t compare me to some weirdo with a goblin fixation!”

“Sure, sure. You did indeed, work hard.”

Over at the next table, Heavy Warrior’s party teased their leaders about their budding romance.

“And so it’s all, You oughta settle down yourself!”

“Y-yeah. Wait. Are you talking about the letter your mother sent you the other day?”

“‘How can you call yourself a good child, leaving your parents home and worried about you?’ she says!”

“Er, y-you know my parents are gone.”

“…Hey, are you listening to me?”

“Yeah, yeah, sure we are. Will somebody do something about this drunk?”

“You’re our leader’s bride. Come on, do something already.”

“Seconded!”

“Hurry up and take responsibility. The rest of us can’t handle him.”

“I will not forsake my vow as a righteous paladin of Order!”

“Damn it all, ain’t anybody know how to listen around here?!”

At length, somebody with a talent for stringed instruments was moved to pluck out a tune. Everyone in the room began to hum along to the endlessly carefree requiem.

O adventurer,

what tragedy that you should die.

Scant space there is on a tombstone.

O adventurer, your name I do not know,

but though you have not left it to us,

O adventurer, if you call me friend—

O my friend,

what tragedy that you should die.

People claim there are many hedonists among adventurers. Those who pay no mind to tomorrow, heeding neither the future nor the past.

But that isn’t precisely true.

Many adventurers who have survived for very long are realists. They recognize that one may chase one’s dream, may use every means available, yet may die without reaching it.

How foolish, then, to regret anything: be it small mistakes, a failed adventure, or the death of one’s friends.

If one cannot meet these things with a smile and move on, then what hope is there?

“You humans do love a ruckus, don’t you?” High Elf Archer eyed the celebration from her spot at a corner table. “End of the year, start of the year, middle of the year… Give you half a chance and you’ll be drinking and shouting. You’re worse than the dwarves.”

“You say that like it’s a bad thing, Long-Ears.” Dwarf Shaman, holding a roasted chicken with both hands, was in high spirits. How could he be otherwise? The New Year’s celebration was larded with every kind of delicious food and wine aplenty. There was nothing better for a dwarf.

“Who said it was a bad thing? It is the new year, after all.” High Elf Archer winked at Dwarf Shaman, then sipped her drink. The cup in her hand contained grape wine, to which she had added sugar.

She looked around the table, taking in her companions. “So. What are you going to do?”

“…Right.” Noble Fencer nodded, almost imperceptibly. Her honey-colored hair was just starting to grow out again; it reached her shoulders now. A little more and it would cover the scar at the nape of her neck. “…I intend to…to meet with my parents, talk things over with them.”

Her face was still dark, but she managed a slight smile. She had changed into simple clothing by no means suited to an adventure, but her weapons remained at her hip. Her armaments consisted, of course, of two aluminum blades, one short and one long. As long as she had them, all would be well. Her fingers brushed them gently.

“…I want to make graves for my friends, too. Then I’ll decide where I go next.”

“Sounds good to me,” High Elf Archer said. “Family and friends are both really important.”

“The Age of Ice has long since passed, the chalk layer is long buried, and the time of my forebears distant, but their blood is here.” The somber words Lizard Priest murmured sounded like some kind of prayer. Then he opened his jaws wide and inhaled a piece of cheese.

Nectar! Sweet nectar! He lashed his tail and squinted his eyes at the richness of it, chewing eagerly and swallowing it down before finally taking a breath.

“Every blood member of your tribe may not be a good person, but I agree that it is best to value our relations.”

“…Yes. Um, about that.” This seemed to be the push Noble Fencer needed. She couldn’t quite bring herself to look up, blushing slightly and shifting in her seat as she said, “…I’ll… I’ll write to you. Letters…”

Those were, in the end, the only words she said.

“Yes, please,” Priestess responded immediately. “Any time you have anything to tell us, don’t hesitate to write.” She had been at the Temple for a ceremony marking the passing of the year, after which she had taken a bath, so she was now pleasantly warm. She took Noble Fencer’s hand in hers and held it firmly. “I’ll write back to you, lots and lots!” she promised.

“…Right. A lot. I’ll write plenty to you, too.”

“Oh, me too!” High Elf Archer interjected. “I’ve always wanted to try writing a letter to a friend.”

The three girl adventurers chatted away happily. Two more women watched them, smiling: Guild Girl, who had sneaked to their table for a breather, and Cow Girl, whom she’d gestured over.

“Hee-hee-hee. Quite friendly, aren’t they?” Guild Girl said.

“They sure are! Maybe I’ll write a letter, too.” Cow Girl was leaning on the table (apparently the celebratory atmosphere had convinced her not to stand on ceremony), her huge chest squished against the surface. “I don’t get a lot of chances to meet other girls my age, working on the farm.”

“You don’t meet a lot more of them working at the Guild, believe me.” Guild Girl put some pepper on the stir-fried liver she’d ordered as a side dish and brought it to her mouth, nodding. “Plus, we’re officially discouraged from getting too close to the adventurers.

“Not that that stops us,” she added with a mischievous wink.

The five women were only tenuously connected, but they bonded immediately. Time and friendship are often thus.

But this meant that the men, of whom there were only two, were grievously outnumbered.

“I could wish milord Goblin Slayer had joined us tonight,” Lizard Priest said quietly.

“You said it,” Dwarf Shaman replied. “Beard-cutter needs to have more of these opportunities.” He rested his chin on his hands but then snapped his fingers as if he had had a wonderful idea. “I’ve got it. That’ll be one of my resolutions for the coming year.”

“Don’t hold your breath,” High Elf Archer said, giggling at the men’s dispirited exchange. “I guess he’s an exception anyway. Orcbolg doesn’t seem to be much for festivals and celebrations and merrymaking.”

Indeed, the adventurer called Goblin Slayer was not to be seen anywhere in the tavern. Priestess stretched her little body to look around, but there was no sign of him. “You’re right, even though he seems to be able to hold his liquor perfectly well. Where is Goblin Slayer anyway?”

“Ahh…”

“Hmm…”

Guild Girl and Cow Girl made strained noises and refused to say anything further, but exchanged a meaningful glance.

“As his childhood friend, I’m sure you don’t want to budge…”

“Ah-ha-ha-ha-ha-ha-ha-ha. It would be a lie to say I’m eager.” Cow Girl laughed, took a sip of her drink, and nodded once. “But maybe… Maybe just this year, I will.”

“Maybe so. He said he wouldn’t go to the fair.”

Priestess was thoroughly flummoxed by this enigmatic but seemingly significant conversation. As she looked on in confusion, Cow Girl noisily pulled out a box from beside her.

“Well, maybe we can ask you to deliver a message for us, then. Okay?”

“A message?”

“Yep.”

“Uh, I don’t mind, but…”

“Hold on. Is that…a boxed meal?” High Elf Archer, her long ears jumping, leaned in and peeked at the box, full of curiosity. “Bread, soup… If you need someone to go outside, I could do it.”

“No, Miss Elf, I think you have plenty of chances,” Guild Girl said with an ambiguous smile.

“Huh? I don’t know what you’re talking about, but if you say so…”

“I do,” Guild Girl said to the suspicious forest dweller, taking a draught of her drink.

High Elf Archer drained her newly refilled cup, her ears bouncing all the while. The warmth of the wind spread through her body, and as her mood improved, she began feeling more generous.

“Sure, fine,” she said. “I don’t mind, whatever you say.”

“You’re it, then,” Cow Girl said to Priestess, bowing her head with a mixture of regret and apology.

“R-right. Um, okay, then. Where should I deliver it?”

“Well, if he’s doing what he usually does, then—”

§

Isolated from the frontier town, distant even from the farm, was a sprawling field.

A snowy wind blew freely there, with nothing to block it.

There was only a small tent and a single flickering bonfire.

The horizon was dark; it was a new day, but dawn was still far off.

A man sat next to the fire. Suddenly, he looked up, as if he had just noticed something.

“There are no goblins. You may come out.”

“……That’s no way to talk to a lady.”

With a rustle, Priestess walked out of the bushes, answering Goblin Slayer’s summons. She had walked half an hour from town, and now she held her frozen hands toward the fire with a sigh of relief. She was wearing a poncho to ward off the cold, but it was still a winter night.

“Just what are you doing out here?”

“I’m on guard.” His answer was every bit as succinct as she expected. “Most people are at New Year’s celebrations. Goblins may take the opportunity for a retaliatory attack on us.”

Come to think of it, he said about the same thing during the harvest festival, didn’t he?

The flash of the revived memory left Priestess with an unpleasant premonition, and she found she couldn’t help asking:

“Perchance, do you do this every year?”

“Don’t ask silly questions.”

“S-sure. Right.”

“New Year’s Eve comes every year.”

Oh, for… This impossible, impossible man.

By now, Priestess was well aware of what was going on. The delivery she had been asked to make—food in a little box—made perfect sense, too. Cow Girl and Guild Girl knew just what he was up to; they were worried and wanted someone to check on him.

“I do this every year. There’s no problem.”

“Yes, there is!”

“Is that so?”

Despite his friends’ worries, Goblin Slayer himself seemed utterly unconcerned, sitting by his fire and staring into the darkness. Everyone else was back in town, living it up on New Year’s Eve, and he was here, all alone.

“I can’t believe it. You’ve even set up a camp. You’re sleeping out here…”

“The harvest festival was attacked. There are no guarantees it won’t happen again.”

For goodness’ sake… That only happened once, and yet he’s talking like he’s already caught a goblin!

There was simply nothing more Priestess could say.

The wind picked up. Snow began falling again, little flakes darting through the silence.

Unexpectedly, there came a quiet murmur from Goblin Slayer. “…I’ve spent ten years slaying goblins.”

Ten years.

Priestess could only blink at the thought.

In all the time they had known each other, she had never really asked him what had happened to him, back…before.

How many days, how many hours, had he expended on the killing of goblins?

“That is why I can stand against them so capably. But… I cannot promise that the goblins will never evolve.”

His speech was slow and measured. He filled in the pauses in his words by poking at the fire. The flames, which had begun to burn low with the cold, sprang back to brilliant life.

“Do you know what the goblin paladin was planning?”

“No…”

“Metalworks. A refinery.”

A gust of wind sent snow spiraling around them.

“That’s impossible…,” Priestess said. When she spoke, she found her voice was shaking more than she expected. It must have been because she was cold. It was winter, and snow was falling. Surely that was it.

“Yes. But I can think of nothing else,” Goblin Slayer said, dropping his gaze to the fire. The glow of the flames cast strange shadows on his helmet. “A dwarven fortress. Mining tools. And that girl’s aluminum sword. It was forged from a jewel, by lightning. Meaning…”

He didn’t have to finish his thought. Priestess understood.

A blade forged with lightning from a red gem…

Goblins rarely if ever conceived of making anything themselves. If they needed lightning, they would simply steal it.

From some stupid spell caster–adventurer, say.

They would capture a wizard, break her spirit, and then force her to cast spells until she died. With that, a goblin army in possession of metal would be born. They would be clad in armor, their heads protected by helmets; they would wield swords and shields.

True, the idea could be dismissed as nothing more than an obsessive fantasy. There were too many uncertain elements. For example, what had really been a part of the goblins’ plans? Had it begun with the intention to capture Noble Fencer? Or did it reach back to when they first made the dwarven fortress their base? Still…

“Is it fate or chance that moves the events of this world? Even the gods don’t know…”

The words that spilled suddenly from Priestess’s mouth were the truth indeed. Just what influenced the dice rolled by the gods in the heavens above? That was a huge mystery.

It’s a question we can’t answer no matter how much we think about it.

As pointless as trying to count the number of goblins in the world.

“I don’t know how much or how long I can prove opponent for them. But I will not relent.”

And yet, this person, this man, was spending his life attempting exactly that.

“For… For crying out loud!” Priestess let out a breath and smacked herself on her cold, stiff cheeks. “It’s always goblins, goblins, goblins. The minute you open your mouth, that’s all you talk about.”

“Erk…”

“You have to relax once in a while, or you’ll run your body and soul into the ground.” Priestess put her hands on her hips and looked away from him like a pouting child. It was partly in jest, partly to tease, and partly deliberate. “I suppose you think goblin slaying is more important than enjoying yourself with your friends.”

“…No.”

“See? Just what I thought. It’s New Year’s Eve! You could at least—”

…No?

“Wha?”

Caught totally off guard by this impossible word, Priestess looked him square in the face. As square as she could anyway, with him wearing his helmet as always. She couldn’t even see his face.

Yet, somewhere behind that visor, she thought she could just glimpse a red eye…

“I confess, parties are not my strong suit,” he said. “But I’m glad everyone enjoys celebrating.”

Sheesh.

Priestess let out a long sigh. The white smoke climbed up into the heavens.

They budged for me, so I could be here…

“Silly man… A warrior, all by yourself? You should at least have someone on backup to help you.”

“……It’s cold.”

“I know.”

“I see.”

Her short answer had evoked a short response. All the same, he moved aside to make room for her closer to the fire.

Priestess slid her small body in beside him, spreading her poncho so it covered both of them.





“Well, then, that’s that. Let’s have something to eat, why don’t we? It’ll help us keep our strength through till morning.”

They were close. They had been closer before sometimes, on adventures, yet somehow she found herself feeling shy.

She looked away from him and busied herself putting a stew pot over the fire, stirring it. A sweet aroma billowed from it, and Priestess deliberately focused her attention on the smell.

“Looks like it’s stew. I’ll warm it up.”

“I see.” A pause. Then: “…Oh, that’s right. There’s something I meant to say.”

“What’s that?”

Goblin Slayer smiled, just slightly.

“I look forward to another year of adventuring with you.”





AFTERWORD


Hullo, Kumo Kagyu here. How did you like Goblin Slayer, Vol. 5? This was a story in which goblins showed up on a snowy mountain and had to be slain. I hope you enjoyed it.

Once again, Noboru Kannatuki-sensei provided fantastic illustrations. Thank you, Sensei!

In Volume 4, there were goblins in some of the black-and-white illustrations; in this volume, they show up on the color pages. Those goblins…they’re multiplying.

To Kousuke Kurose-sensei, thank you for producing such an awesome manga version of the series every month.

By the time this volume is released, I think the manga should be catching up to the “attack on the farm” sequence. I’m sure it’s going to be amazing!

Thank you, too, to all my readers, including all those encouraging me on the web. Thanks so much to the site admins. I’ll keep on giving it everything I’ve got.

To my gaming buddies, thank you for every session. Although I still think there was something weird about that one roll…

To all my creative-type friends, I’ll keep leaning on you. It’s thanks to you that I’m able to write.

To everyone in the editorial division, and everyone involved in the production of this book, as always thank you so much.

So, Goblin Slayer and his friends have survived a year of adventuring. That’s surely thanks to everyone out there.

And me, I’ve survived a year of writing Goblin Slayer, a year in which a lot has happened. Translations have appeared in multiple languages; I was invited to Taiwan; drama CDs, a manga series, and side stories have all been released.

Life really is full of the unexpected. I keep thinking I’m going to open my eyes and find myself lying in bed. It’ll turn out I’ve just been sleeping for a whole year!

The other day, a dancing-girl adventurer danced her heart out at the bar and made enough money to take care of her entire party. I’m of the opinion that adventuring doesn’t pay well considering all that you have to put into it, but if you want to make your way in the world, it’s kind of unavoidable.

The great men of the past said that adventuring just meant finding new ways to die.

Incidentally, that dancing girl gave the money she made to her husband.

Thank you, honey! Be my breadwinner!

The money was put into the party’s common fund. Ah, Mr. Husband, what fine and measured judgment you display!

Our dear Priestess will probably need to start considering what adventure means to her soon. Volume 6 will probably have something to do with that, as well as being a story where goblins show up and need to be goblin-slain.

I’m going to write the best book I can. I hope you’ll join me!





Thank you for buying this ebook, published by Yen On.


To get news about the latest manga, graphic novels, and light novels from Yen Press, along with special offers and exclusive content, sign up for the Yen Press newsletter.


Sign Up

Or visit us at www.yenpress.com/booklink





